===================constraint prompt===========================

        Please extract each requirement and constraint in Userid: CPM Schema: instrx Leadpct: 100% Pt. size: 9 Draft  Ok to Print
AH XSL/XML Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source (Init. & Date) _______
Page 1 of 15  10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Instructions for Form W -7
(Rev. November 2023)
Application for IRS Individual Taxpayer Identification  Number
(Use with the August 2019 revision of Form W -7)
Department of the T reasury
Internal Revenue Service
Section references are to the Internal Revenue Code unless 
otherwise noted.
Contents Page
Future Developments ........................ 1
What’s New ............................... 1
Reminders ................................ 1
General Instructions ......................... 2
Purpose of Form ......................... 2
Who Is Eligible T o Complete This Form ......... 2
Additional Information ..................... 3
Supporting Documentation Requirements ...... 3
Additional Documentation Requirements ....... 4
How T o Apply ........................... 4
When T o Apply .......................... 5
Where T o Apply ......................... 6
Specific Instructions ......................... 6
Application T ype ......................... 6
Reason Y ou’re Submitting Form W-7 .......... 6
Line Instructions ......................... 8
Signature .............................. 9
Exceptions T ables .......................... 11
Future Developments
For the latest information about developments related to Form 
W-7 and its instructions, such as legislation enacted after they 
were published, go to IRS.gov/FormW7 .
What’s New
Conversion to generic dates. We converted specific dates to 
generic dates wherever possible so these instructions would 
remain applicable even in years when they aren’t updated.
Line 1a. We clarify that you should properly identify your full 
name.
Reminders
Renewal applications. All Form W-7 renewal applications must 
include a U.S. federal tax return unless you meet an exception to 
the requirement. See Exceptions T ables , later, for more 
information.Expanded discussion of allowable tax benefit. Spouses and 
dependents are not eligible for an ITIN or to renew an ITIN 
unless they are claimed for an allowable tax benefit or they file 
their own tax return. See Allowable tax benefit , later, for more 
information.
Expired ITINs. If your ITIN wasn’t included on at least one U.S. 
federal tax return for the last 3 consecutive tax years, it will expire 
on December 31 of the third consecutive tax year, and must be 
renewed before being used again on a U.S. federal tax return.
ITINs with middle digits (the fourth and fifth positions) “70,” 
“71,” “72,” “73,” “74,” “75,” “76,” “77,” “78,” “79,” “80,” “81,” “82,” 
“83,” “84,” “85,” “86,” “87,” or “88” have expired. In addition, ITINs 
with middle digits “90,” “91,” “92,” “94,” “95,” “96,” “97,” “98,” or 
“99,” IF assigned before 2013 , have expired.
If you previously submitted a renewal application and it 
was approved, you do not need to renew again. 
Otherwise, see How T o Apply , later, for more 
information.
Information returns. If your ITIN is only being used on 
information returns for reporting purposes, you don’t need to 
renew your ITIN at this time. However, in the future, if you need to 
use the ITIN to file a U.S. federal tax return, you will need to 
renew the ITIN at that time.
Dependent applicants must specify their relationship to 
the U.S. citizen/resident alien. An applicant who chooses 
reason d must enter the relationship he or she has to the U.S. 
citizen/resident alien in the designated space on Form W-7.
The passport isn’t a stand-alone document for certain de-
pendents if no date of entry into the United States is 
present. A passport that doesn’t have a date of entry into the 
United States won’t be accepted as a stand-alone identification 
document for certain dependents. See Proof of U.S. residency 
for applicants who are dependents  under Supporting 
Documentation Requirements , later, for more information.
Change of address. It’s important that the IRS is aware of your 
current mailing address. This address is used to mail notices 
about your Form W-7, including notification of your assigned 
ITIN, and return your original supporting documentation. If you 
move before you receive your ITIN, notify us of your current 
mailing address immediately, so we may update our records. Y ou 
may send a letter to the IRS using the address under Where T o 
Apply , later.
CAUTION!
Nov 1, 2023 Cat. No. 54092GPage 2 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
General Instructions
What’s an ITIN. An ITIN is a nine-digit number issued by the 
IRS to individuals who are required for federal tax purposes to 
have a U.S. taxpayer identification number but who don’t have 
and aren’t eligible to get a social security number (SSN).
Purpose of Form
Use Form W-7 for the following purposes.
•To apply for a new ITIN.  Individuals applying for an ITIN 
must include a U.S. federal tax return unless they meet an 
exception, and the required documentation.
•To renew an ITIN.  An ITIN only needs to be renewed if it’ll be 
included on a U.S. federal tax return and it’s expired. Individuals 
renewing an ITIN must include a U.S. federal tax return unless 
they meet an exception, and the required documentation. See 
How T o Apply , later, for more information on how to renew your 
ITIN.
If your ITIN is only  used on information returns filed with 
the IRS by third parties, you don’t have to renew your 
ITIN even if the ITIN has expired for purposes of filing a 
U.S. federal tax return. However, in the future, if you file an 
income tax return, you will need to renew your ITIN at that time.
The ITIN is for federal tax purposes only. An ITIN doesn’t 
entitle you to social security benefits and doesn’t change your 
immigration status or your right to work in the United States.
The ITIN can’t be used to claim certain federal tax credits. 
Individuals filing tax returns using an ITIN aren’t eligible for the 
earned income credit (EIC). Also, a child who has an ITIN can’t 
be counted as a qualifying child in figuring the amount of the EIC. 
For more information, see Pub. 596, Earned Income Credit 
(EIC). Also, for tax years 2018 through 2025, a child who has an 
ITIN can’t be claimed as a qualifying child for purposes of the 
child tax credit and the additional child tax credit. For more 
information, see Schedule 8812 (Form 1040), Credits for 
Qualifying Children and Other Dependents, and its instructions. 
If an ITIN is applied for on or before the due date of a return 
(including extensions) and the IRS issues an ITIN as a result of 
the application, the IRS will consider the ITIN as issued on or 
before the due date of the return. See the instructions for your 
U.S. federal tax return for more information.
The ITIN may not be required for an electing small busi-
ness trust (ESBT) election. A nonresident alien who is a 
potential current beneficiary of an ESBT and who is not 
otherwise required to have a taxpayer identification number for 
U.S. tax purposes does not need a taxpayer identification 
number to make a valid ESBT election.
Social security numbers. Don’t complete Form W-7 if you 
have an SSN or if you’re eligible to get an SSN. Y ou’re eligible for 
an SSN if you’re a U.S. citizen or if you’ve been admitted by the 
United States for permanent residence or U.S. employment.
T o get an SSN, see Form SS-5, Application for a Social 
Security Card. T o get Form SS-5 or to find out if you’re eligible to 
get an SSN, go to SSA.gov  or contact a Social Security 
Administration (SSA) office.
If you have an application for an SSN pending, don’t file Form 
W-7. Complete Form W-7 only if the SSA notifies you that you’re 
ineligible for an SSN.
If the SSA determines that you’re not eligible for an SSN, you 
must get a letter of denial and attach it to your Form W-7. This 
applies whether you’re attaching Form W-7 to your U.S. federal 
tax return or not. However, students, professors, and 
researchers, see information for box f , later.
Once you are issued an SSN, use it to file your tax return. Use 
your SSN to file your tax return even if your SSN does not 
CAUTION!authorize employment or if you have been issued an SSN that 
authorizes employment and you lose your employment 
authorization. An ITIN will not be issued to you once you have 
been issued an SSN. If you received your SSN after previously 
using an ITIN, stop using your ITIN. Use your SSN instead.
Allowable tax benefit. For tax years after December 31, 2017, 
spouses and dependents are NOT  eligible for an ITIN or to 
renew an ITIN unless they are claimed for an allowable tax 
benefit or they file their own tax return. Spouses and dependents 
must be listed on an attached U.S. federal tax return and include 
the schedule or form that applies to the allowable tax benefit. An 
allowable tax benefit includes a spouse filing a joint return, head 
of household (HOH) , American opportunity tax credit (AOTC) , 
premium tax credit (PTC) , child and dependent care credit 
(CDCC) , or credit for other dependents (ODC) .
Head of household (HOH). If Form W-7 is submitted to 
claim the HOH filing status, then an attached tax return that lists 
the applicant as a dependent is required. Dependent applicants 
must be your qualifying children or qualifying relatives and must 
either:
•Have lived with you for more than half the year (including 
temporary absences), or
•Be your parent.
See Pub. 501 for more information.
An ITIN will not be assigned or renewed for an HOH 
qualifying person who is not also claimed as a 
dependent on an attached tax return.
American opportunity tax credit (AOTC). If Form W-7 is 
submitted to claim the AOTC, then an attached tax return and 
Form 8863 that list the applicant are required. Dependent 
applicants must be qualifying children or qualifying relatives of 
the taxpayer who claims the AOTC. See Pub. 970 for more 
information.
Premium tax credit (PTC). If Form W-7 is submitted to claim 
the PTC, then an attached tax return that lists the applicant and 
Form 8962 are required. See Pub. 974 for more information.
Child and dependent care credit (CDCC). If Form W-7 is 
submitted to claim the CDCC, then an attached tax return and 
Form 2441 that list the applicant as a qualifying person are 
required. See Pub. 503 for more information.
Credit for other dependents (ODC). If Form W-7 is 
submitted to claim the ODC, the applicant must be listed on an 
attached tax return with the “Credit for other dependents” box 
checked next to their name. Dependent applicants must be your 
qualifying children or qualifying relatives who are U.S. residents 
or U.S. nationals. See Schedule 8812 (Form 1040) and its 
instructions for more information.
Who Is Eligible To Complete This 
Form
The following individuals are eligible to complete Form W-7.
1.Any individual who isn’t eligible to get an SSN but who 
must furnish a taxpayer identification number for U.S. tax 
purposes or to file a U.S. federal tax return must apply for an ITIN 
on Form W-7. Examples include the following.
•A nonresident alien individual claiming reduced withholding 
under an applicable income tax treaty for which an ITIN is 
required (see Regulations section 1.1441-1(e)(4)(vii)(A)). Also 
see Pub. 515, Withholding of T ax on Nonresident Aliens and 
Foreign Entities.
•A nonresident alien individual not eligible for an SSN who is 
required to file a U.S. federal tax return or who is filing a U.S. 
federal tax return only to claim a refund.
•A nonresident alien individual not eligible for an SSN who 
elects to file a joint U.S. federal tax return with a spouse who is a 
U.S. citizen or resident alien. See Pub. 519, U.S. T ax Guide for 
Aliens.
CAUTION!
-2- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 3 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
•A U.S. resident alien (based on the number of days present in 
the United States, known as the “substantial presence” test) who 
files a U.S. federal tax return but who isn’t eligible for an SSN. 
For information about the substantial presence test, see Pub. 
519.
•A nonresident alien student, professor, or researcher who is 
required to file a U.S. federal tax return but who isn’t eligible for 
an SSN, or who is claiming an exception to the tax return filing 
requirement. See Pub. 519.
•An alien spouse claimed as an exemption on a U.S. federal 
tax return who isn’t eligible to get an SSN. See Pub. 501, 
Dependents, Standard Deduction, and Filing Information, and 
Pub. 519.
A spouse can be claimed as an exemption only for tax 
years prior to 2018.
•An alien individual eligible to be claimed as a dependent on a 
U.S. federal tax return but who isn’t eligible to get an SSN. Y our 
spouse is never considered your dependent. For more 
information about whether an alien individual is eligible to be 
claimed as a dependent on a U.S. federal tax return, see Pubs. 
501 and 519.
Dependents can be claimed as exemptions only for tax 
years prior to 2018.
•A dependent/spouse of a nonresident alien U.S. visa holder 
who isn’t eligible for an SSN. See Pub. 519.
Dependents and spouses can be claimed as exemptions 
only for tax years prior to 2018.
Note. The deduction for personal exemptions was suspended 
for tax years 2018 through 2025. For tax years beginning after 
2017, spouses or dependents aren’t eligible for an ITIN, unless 
they are claimed for an allowable tax benefit. The individual must 
be listed on an attached U.S. federal tax return with the schedule 
or form that applies to the allowable tax benefit. See the 
instructions for your U.S. federal tax return for more information.
2.Persons who must renew their ITIN to file a U.S. federal 
tax return. See Renewal of an existing ITIN  under How T o Apply , 
later.
Additional Information
For more information, visit IRS.gov/ITIN .
Publications. See Pubs. 501, 515, 519, and 1915 for more 
information.
Y ou can visit IRS.gov/Forms  to download these publications 
as well as other forms at no cost. Otherwise, you can go to 
IRS.gov/OrderForms  to order current and prior-year forms and 
instructions. Y our order should be mailed to you within 10 
business days. Y ou can also call 800-TAX-FORM 
(800-829-3676) if you’re in the United States to order forms and 
publications.
Telephone help. If, after reading these instructions and our free 
publications, you’re not sure how to complete your application or 
have additional questions, call 800-829-1040 if you’re in the 
United States. If you’re outside of the United States, call 
267-941-1000 (not a toll-free number) for assistance.
Supporting Documentation 
Requirements
Whether you are applying for a new ITIN or renewing an existing 
ITIN, you must provide documentation that meets the following 
requirements.
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
CAUTION!1.Y ou must submit documentation to establish your identity 
and your connection to a foreign country (“foreign status”). 
Applicants claimed as dependents must also prove U.S. 
residency unless the applicant is from Canada or Mexico or the 
applicant is a dependent of U.S. military personnel stationed 
overseas.
2.Y ou must submit original documents, or certified copies of 
these documents from the issuing agency, that support the 
information provided on Form W-7. A certified copy of a 
document is one that the original issuing agency  provides and 
certifies as an exact copy of the original document and contains 
an official stamped seal from the agency. Y ou may be able to 
request a certified copy of documents at an embassy or 
consulate. However, services may vary between countries, so it’s 
recommended that you contact the appropriate consulate or 
embassy for specific information.
Original documents you submit will be returned to you at 
the mailing address shown on your Form W-7. Y ou don’t 
need to provide a return envelope. Applicants are 
permitted to include a prepaid Express Mail or courier envelope 
for faster return delivery of their documents and to ensure the 
secure delivery of valuable documents, such as passports. The 
IRS will then return the documents in the envelope provided by 
the applicant. If your original documents aren’t returned within 60 
days, you can call the IRS (see T elephone help , earlier). If you 
will need your documents for any purpose within 60 days of 
submitting your ITIN application, you may wish to apply in person 
at an IRS T axpayer Assistance Center or a CAA. See Where T o 
Apply , later.
3.The documentation you provide must be current (that is, 
not expired).
There are 13 acceptable documents, as shown in the 
following table. At least one document must contain your 
photograph, unless you’re a dependent under age 14 (under age 
18 if a student). Y ou may later be required by the IRS to provide a 
certified translation of foreign-language documents.
TIP
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -3-Page 4 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Supporting DocumentationCan be used to 
establish:
Foreign 
statusIdentity
Passport (the only stand-alone document*) x x
U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) 
photo identification x x
Visa issued by the U.S. Department of State x x
U.S. driver’s license x
U.S. military identification card x
Foreign driver’s license x
Foreign military identification card x x
National identification card (must contain name, 
photograph, address, date of birth, and expiration date) x x
U.S. state identification card x
Foreign voter’s registration card x x
Civil birth certificate x** x
Medical records (valid only for dependents under age 6) x** x
School records (valid only for a dependent under age 
18, if a student) x** x
* Applicants claimed as dependents who need to prove U.S. residency must 
provide additional original documentation if the passport doesn’t have a date 
of entry into the United States. See Proof of U.S. residency for applicants who 
are dependents  below.
** May be used to establish foreign status only if documents are foreign.
If you submit an original valid passport or a certified copy from 
the issuing agency, you don’t need to submit any other 
documents from the table, unless the passport is for a 
dependent and it doesn’t include a date of entry into the United 
States.
Proof of U.S. residency for applicants who are 
dependents. A passport that doesn’t have a date of entry into 
the United States won’t be accepted as a stand-alone 
identification document for dependents, unless they are from 
Canada or Mexico, or are dependents of U.S. military personnel 
stationed overseas. In these cases, applicants will be required to 
submit at least one of the following original documents in 
addition to the passport to prove U.S. residency.
•If under 6 years of age:  A U.S. medical record, U.S. school 
record, or U.S. state identification card that lists the applicant’s 
name and U.S. address, or a U.S. visa.
•If at least 6 years of age but under 18 years of age:  A U.S. 
school record, U.S. state identification card or driver’s license 
that lists the applicant’s name and U.S. address, or a U.S. visa.
•If 18 years of age or older:  A U.S. school record, rental 
statement from a U.S. property, utility bill for a U.S. property, or a 
U.S. bank statement, U.S. state identification card or driver’s 
license that lists the applicant’s name and U.S. address, or a 
U.S. visa.
If you check box d for a dependent of a U.S. citizen or 
resident alien, then you may submit an original valid passport (or 
a certified copy from the issuing agency) without any other 
documents to prove your “foreign status” or “identity” only if the 
passport has a date of entry into the United States. Otherwise, 
you must submit one of the additional documents listed earlier in 
the “Supporting Documentation” table with your passport to 
prove residency. If you don’t have one of the additional 
documents listed earlier in the “Supporting Documentation” table 
to submit with your passport, you can’t use your passport as a 
stand-alone supporting document and must submit at least two 
types of documents listed in the “Supporting Documentation” table that prove residency, identity, and foreign status, and that 
meet the photograph requirement explained earlier.
Additional Documentation Requirements
Civil birth certificate. An original birth certificate is required 
if the applicant is under age 18 and hasn’t provided a valid 
passport. Civil birth certificates are considered current at all 
times because they don’t contain an expiration date.
Passports and national identification cards. These 
documents will be considered current only if their expiration date 
hasn’t passed prior to the date the Form W-7 is submitted.
Note. Certified copies of a passport from the issuing agency 
must include the U.S. visa pages if a visa is required for your 
Form W-7 application.
Medical records. Medical records will be accepted for 
dependents under 6 years of age. A medical record consists 
only of a shot/immunization record that documents the patient's 
name and chronological dates of the patient's medical history 
and care. The medical record must contain the child’s name, 
date of birth, and verifiable address. Shot/immunization records 
will be accepted only if they document the applicant’s name and 
chronological dates of the applicant’s medical history and care. 
In addition, the medical record must document the name, 
address, and phone number of the doctor, hospital, or clinic 
where treatment was last administered. If this information isn’t 
printed on the medical record, the medical record must be 
accompanied by a dated letter providing the required information 
on official letterhead from the federal authority, physician, 
hospital, or clinic that administered the latest care of the child. 
The medical record must be dated no more than 12 months 
before the date of the Form W-7 application. If the passport 
doesn’t have a date of entry into the United States, the medical 
record must be from a U.S. facility, unless the applicant is a 
dependent of U.S. military personnel stationed overseas or is 
from Canada or Mexico and the applicant is claimed for an 
allowable tax benefit.
School records. School records will be accepted only if they 
are for a school term ending no more than 12 months from the 
date of the Form W-7 application. The school record must 
consist of an official report card or transcript issued by the 
school or the equivalent of a Ministry of Education. The school 
record must also be signed by a school official or ministry 
official. The record must be dated and contain the student’s 
name, coursework with grades (unless under age 6), date of 
grading period(s) (unless under age 6) for a term ending no more 
than 12 months from the date of the Form W-7 application, and 
school name and address. If the passport doesn’t have a date of 
entry into the United States, the school record must be from a 
U.S. facility, unless the applicant is a dependent of U.S. military 
personnel stationed overseas or is from Canada or Mexico and 
the applicant is claimed for an allowable tax benefit.
How To Apply
Follow the guidelines below if you’re applying for a new ITIN or 
renewing an existing ITIN.
For your convenience, you can access fillable Form W-7 
at IRS.gov/pub/irs-pdf/fw7.pdf , complete, print, then sign 
the Form W-7.
Note. Keep a copy of your application for your records.
Applying for an ITIN for the first time. If you’ve never had an 
ITIN before and are submitting an application for a new ITIN, 
include the following in your Application Package .
1.Y our completed Form W-7.
TIP
-4- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 5 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Note. If you submit a Form W-7, all future ITIN notices and 
correspondence that you receive will be in English. If you prefer 
to receive them in Spanish, submit Form W-7(SP).
2.Y our original tax return(s) for which the ITIN is needed. 
Attach Form W-7 to the front of your tax return. If you’re applying 
for more than one ITIN for the same tax return (such as for a 
spouse or dependent(s)), attach all Forms W-7 to the same tax 
return. Leave the area of the SSN blank on the tax return for 
each person who is applying for an ITIN. After your Forms W-7 
have been processed, the IRS will assign an ITIN to the return 
and process the return.
There are exceptions to the requirement to include a 
U.S. federal tax return. If you claim one of these 
exceptions, you must submit the documentation required 
instead of a tax return. See Exceptions T ables , later.
3.Original documents, or certified copies of these 
documents from the issuing agency, required to support the 
information provided on Form W-7. The required supporting 
documentation must be consistent with each applicant’s 
information provided on Form W-7. For example, the name, date 
of birth, and country(ies) of citizenship shown in the 
documentation must be the same as on Form W-7, lines 1a, 1b, 
4, and 6a. See Supporting Documentation Requirements , 
earlier, for a list of the documents to be submitted with your 
application package.
Renewal of an existing ITIN. If your ITIN has expired and the 
ITIN will be included on a U.S. federal tax return, follow the 
guidelines below to submit your renewal application. If your ITIN 
won’t be included on a U.S. federal tax return, you don’t need to 
renew your ITIN at this time.
If you don’t renew the expired ITIN and you file a 
U.S. federal tax return with the expired ITIN, there 
may be a delay in processing your tax return.
Include the following in your Renewal Application Package .
1.Y our completed Form W-7. Y ou must check a check box 
in the Application type  box at the top of page 1 indicating the 
reason you’re completing the Form W-7 even if you’re applying to 
renew your ITIN.
2.Y our original tax return(s) you’re filing, and on which the 
ITIN is listed. Attach Form W-7 to the front of your tax return. If 
you’re renewing more than one ITIN for the same tax return 
(such as for a spouse or dependent(s)), attach all Forms W-7 to 
the same tax return. After your Forms W-7 have been processed, 
the IRS will process the return.
3.Original documents, or certified copies of these 
documents from the issuing agency, required to support the 
information provided on Form W-7. The required supporting 
documentation must be consistent with each applicant’s 
information provided on Form W-7. For example, the name, date 
of birth, and country(ies) of citizenship shown in the 
documentation must be the same as on Form W-7, lines 1a, 1b, 
4, and 6a. See Supporting Documentation Requirements , 
earlier, for a list of the documents to be submitted with your 
renewal application package.
Spouses and dependents who renew their ITIN to be 
claimed for an allowable tax benefit must be listed on an 
attached U.S. federal tax return with the schedule or 
form that applies to the allowable benefit or, in the case of the 
credit for other dependents, the box next to their name must be 
checked on the attached tax return.
Certified copies. Y ou can submit copies of original documents 
if you do any of the following.
•Have the copies certified by the issuing agency.
TIP
CAUTION!
CAUTION!•Have the officers at U.S. embassies and consulates overseas 
provide certification and authentication services. Contact the 
Consular Section, American Citizens Services of the U.S. 
Embassy or Consulate in advance to determine the hours of 
operation for these services.
Deceased taxpayers. When requesting an ITIN for a deceased 
taxpayer, the deceased must meet all of the requirements 
established to get an ITIN. Also, you must write “Deceased” and 
the date of death across the top of the Form W-7 and include the 
documentation shown in the following chart.
IF you’re: THEN you must include:
The surviving spouse 
filing an original or 
amended joint return with 
their deceased spouse•Form W-7,
•A U.S. individual income tax return, and
•Documentation substantiating the identity 
and foreign status of the deceased.
The court-appointed 
executor or administrator 
of the deceased’s estate 
filing an original tax return 
on behalf of the deceased•Form W-7,
•A U.S. individual income tax return,
•Documentation substantiating the identity 
and foreign status of the deceased*, and
•A court certificate showing your appointment.
Neither the surviving 
spouse nor the 
court-appointed executor 
or administrator of the 
deceased’s estate•Form W-7,
•A U.S. individual income tax return,
•Documentation substantiating the identity 
and foreign status of the deceased*,
•Form 1310 (if a refund is due), and
•A copy of the certificate of death.
* If Form W-7 is for a deceased individual under 18 years of age, one of the 
documents proving identity, foreign status, and/or U.S. residency must be a 
birth certificate, unless a passport with a date of entry into the United States is 
submitted.
ITIN not needed for Forms 4868, 1040-ES, or 1040-ES (NR). 
If you’re filing an application for an extension of time to file using 
Form 4868, or making an estimated tax payment using Form 
1040-ES or Form 1040-ES (NR), don’t file Form W-7 with those 
forms. Enter “ITIN TO BE REQUESTED” wherever your SSN or 
ITIN is requested. An ITIN will be issued only after you file a tax 
return and meet all other requirements.
If you attached your tax return to your Form W-7, leave 
the area of the SSN blank on the new tax return for each 
person who is applying for an ITIN.
When To Apply
First-time ITIN applications. If you’re applying for a new ITIN, 
complete and attach Form W-7 to the front of your tax return and 
file your application package with your tax return for which the 
ITIN is needed on or before the due date for the return. If you’re 
unable to file your tax return by the due date, you must file an 
application for an extension of time to file by the due date of the 
return. Failure to timely file the tax return with a complete Form 
W-7 and required documentation may result in the denial of 
refundable credits, such as the additional child tax credit 
(available for tax years prior to 2018) and the American 
opportunity tax credit, if you otherwise qualify. Don’t file your tax 
return without Form W-7 and required documentation.
If you meet one of the exceptions described in Exceptions 
T ables  at the end of these instructions, you may complete and 
submit Form W-7 at any time.
Y ou can’t electronically file ( e-file ) a return using an ITIN 
in the calendar year the ITIN is assigned. If you need to 
file multiple-year returns, you can attach them all to your 
Form W-7 and submit them to the IRS using one of the methods 
described later in Where T o Apply . Once your ITIN is assigned, 
you can e-file returns in the following years. For example, if you 
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -5-Page 6 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
apply for and receive an ITIN this year, you may not e-file any tax 
return using that ITIN (including prior-year returns) until next 
year.
Renewal ITIN applications. If you’re renewing an existing ITIN, 
you must submit your Form W-7 renewal application with your 
U.S. federal tax return using one of the methods described below 
in Where T o Apply . Spouses and dependents who renew their 
ITIN must be listed on an attached U.S. federal tax return with 
the schedule or form that applies to the allowable tax benefit. If 
you don’t renew your expired ITIN and you file a U.S. federal tax 
return with the expired ITIN, there may be a delay in processing 
your tax return.
Where To Apply
By mail. Mail Form W-7, your tax return (if applicable) or other 
documents required by an exception, and the documentation 
described under Supporting Documentation Requirements , 
earlier, to:
Internal Revenue Service
ITIN Operation
P .O. Box 149342
Austin, TX 78714-9342
If you mail your application, don’t  use the mailing 
address in the instructions for your tax return (for 
example, Form 1040-NR). Y our tax return will be 
processed after it is mailed as part of your application package 
to the address in these instructions.
By private delivery services. If you use a private delivery 
service, submit your Form W-7, your tax return (if applicable) or 
other documents required by an exception, and the 
documentation described under Supporting Documentation 
Requirements , earlier, to:
Internal Revenue Service
ITIN Operation
Mail Stop 6090-AUSC
3651 S. Interregional, Hwy 35
Austin, TX 78741-0000
The private delivery service can tell you how to get written 
proof of the mailing date.
In person. Y ou can apply for your ITIN by visiting designated 
IRS T axpayer Assistance Centers (TACs). They can verify 
original documentation and certified copies of the 
documentation from the issuing agency for primary and 
secondary applicants and their dependents. For dependents, 
TACs can verify passports, national identification cards, and birth 
certificates. These documents will be returned to you 
immediately. Service at TACs is by appointment only. 
Appointments can be scheduled by calling 844-545-5640. See 
IRS.gov/W7DocumentVerification  for a list of designated TACs 
that offer ITIN document authentication service. TACs that don’t 
offer ITIN document authentication service will mail the original 
documents, Form W-7, and the tax return to the IRS Austin 
Service Center for processing.
Through an acceptance agent. Y ou can also apply through 
one of the two types of acceptance agents authorized by the 
IRS.
1.Acceptance Agent (AA).
2.Certifying Acceptance Agent (CAA).
Note. AAs and CAAs are available both domestically and 
abroad.
CAUTION!Acceptance Agent (AA). An AA can help you complete and 
file Form W-7. T o get a list of agents, visit IRS.gov and enter 
“acceptance agent program” in the search box. An AA will need 
to submit original documentation or certified copies of the 
documentation from the issuing agency to the IRS for all 
applicants.
Certifying Acceptance Agent (CAA). A CAA can verify 
original documentation and certified copies of the 
documentation from the issuing agency for primary and 
secondary applicants and their dependents, except for foreign 
military identification cards. For dependents, CAAs can only 
verify passports and birth certificates. The CAA will return the 
documentation immediately after reviewing its authenticity.
Processing times. Allow 7 weeks for the IRS to notify you of 
your ITIN application status (9 to 11 weeks if you submit the 
application during peak processing periods (January 15 through 
April 30) or if you’re filing from overseas). If you haven’t received 
your ITIN or correspondence at the end of that time, you can call 
the IRS to find out the status of your application (see T elephone 
help , earlier).
Specific Instructions
If you’re completing this form for someone else, answer the 
questions as they apply to that individual.
Application Type
Check the applicable box to indicate if you’re:
1.a first-time applicant applying for a new  ITIN, or
2.seeking to renew  an ITIN that you already have.
If you check Renew an existing ITIN , you must answer the 
question on line 6e and include your ITIN information on line 6f. 
See the instructions for lines 6e and 6f for more information.
Reason You’re Submitting Form W-7
You must check the box to indicate the reason you’re 
completing Form W-7 even if you’re applying to renew your 
ITIN.  If more than one box applies to you, check the box that 
best explains your reason for submitting Form W-7. A selection 
must be made in this section.
Note. If you check box a or f, then box h may also be checked. If 
applicable, you must also enter the treaty country and treaty 
article. For more information on treaties, see Pub. 901, U.S. T ax 
T reaties.
a. Nonresident alien required to get an ITIN to claim tax 
treaty benefit. Certain nonresident aliens must get an ITIN to 
claim certain tax treaty benefits even if they don’t have to file a 
U.S. federal tax return. If you check this box to claim the benefits 
of a U.S. income tax treaty with a foreign country, also check box 
h. On the dotted line next to box h, enter the appropriate 
designation for Exception 1 or 2, whichever applies (see 
Exception 1  and Exception 2 , later). Identify the exception by its 
number, alpha subsection, and category under which you’re 
applying (for example, enter “Exception 1d-Pension Income” or 
“Exception 2d-Gambling Winnings”). Also, enter the name of the 
treaty country and treaty article number in the appropriate entry 
spaces below box h and attach the documents required under 
whichever exception applies. For more details on tax treaties, 
see Pub. 901.
b. Nonresident alien filing a U.S. federal tax return. This 
category includes:
•A nonresident alien who must file a U.S. federal tax return to 
report income effectively or not effectively connected with the 
conduct of a trade or business in the United States, and
•A nonresident alien who is filing a U.S. federal tax return only 
to get a refund. See Pub. 519.
-6- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 7 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
If you choose reason b, you must  provide a complete 
foreign address on line 3.
c. U.S. resident alien (based on days present in the United 
States) filing a U.S. federal tax return. A foreign individual 
living or present in the United States for a certain number of days 
(that is, meeting the test known as the “substantial presence” 
test) who doesn’t have permission to work from the USCIS, and 
is ineligible for an SSN, may still be required to file a U.S. federal 
tax return. These individuals must check this box and include a 
date of entry into the United States on line 6d. For information 
about the substantial presence test, see Pub. 519.
d. Dependent of U.S. citizen/resident alien. This is an 
individual who can be claimed as a dependent on a U.S. federal 
tax return and isn’t eligible to get an SSN. Y our spouse is never 
considered your dependent. See Pubs. 501 and 519. 
Dependents of U.S. military personnel can submit original 
documents, certified copies or notarized copies of identification 
documents. A copy of the servicemember’s U.S. military ID will 
be required or the applicant must be applying from an overseas 
APO/FPO address. A copy of the servicemember’s U.S. military 
ID is required to be included with the application if the 
documents are notarized.
If you’re applying for an ITIN under this category, you must 
provide the relationship (for example, parent, child, grandchild, 
etc.) of the dependent to the U.S. citizen/resident alien. Enter the 
information on the dotted line in the space provided.
Also, if you’re applying for an ITIN under this category, you 
must  provide the full name and SSN or ITIN  of the U.S. citizen/
resident alien. Enter the information on the dotted line in the 
space provided and include a date of entry into the United States 
on line 6d, unless the applicant is a dependent of U.S. military 
personnel stationed overseas or is from Canada or Mexico and 
the applicant is claimed for an allowable tax benefit.
Note. If you live abroad and requested an adoption taxpayer 
identification number (ATIN) for a foreign child you adopted or 
who has been legally placed in your home pending adoption and 
that request was denied, your dependent may be eligible for an 
ITIN. When submitting your Form W-7, make sure that you 
include a copy of the legal documents verifying your relationship 
to the child.
Dependents can be claimed as personal exemptions 
only for tax years prior to 2018. However, the credit for 
other dependents (ODC) for your child and other 
qualifying relatives (excluding your spouse) who live in the 
United States may be available. See the instructions for your 
U.S. federal tax return for more information.
e. Spouse of U.S. citizen/resident alien. This category 
includes:
•A resident or nonresident alien spouse who isn’t filing a U.S. 
federal tax return (including a joint return) and who isn’t eligible 
to get an SSN but who, as a spouse, is claimed as an exemption; 
and
•A resident or nonresident alien spouse who isn’t eligible to get 
an SSN but who is electing to file a U.S. federal tax return jointly 
with a spouse who is a U.S. citizen or resident alien. For more 
information about this category, see Pubs. 501 and 519.
Spouses of U.S. military personnel can submit original 
documents, certified copies, or notarized copies of identification 
documents. A copy of the servicemember’s U.S. military ID will 
be required or the applicant must be applying from an overseas 
APO/FPO address. A copy of the servicemember’s U.S. military 
ID is required to be included with the application if the 
documents are notarized.
CAUTION!
CAUTION!If you’re applying for an ITIN under this category, you must 
provide the full name and SSN or ITIN  of the U.S. citizen/
resident alien. Enter the information on the dotted line in the 
space provided.
A spouse can be claimed as a personal exemption only 
for tax years prior to 2018.
f. Nonresident alien student, professor, or researcher filing 
a U.S. federal tax return or claiming an exception. This is an 
individual who hasn’t abandoned his or her residence in a 
foreign country and who is a bona fide student, professor, or 
researcher coming temporarily to the United States solely to 
attend classes at a recognized institution of education, to teach, 
or to perform research. For more information about the U.S. tax 
rules that apply to foreign students, professors, or researchers, 
see Pub. 519.
If you check this box, you must complete lines 6a, 6c, 6d, and 
6g, and provide your passport with a valid U.S. visa. No U.S. visa 
needs to be provided if the foreign address is Canada, Mexico, 
or Bermuda. If you’re present in the United States on a 
work-related visa (F-1, J-1, or M-1), but won’t be employed (that 
is, your presence in the United States is study related), you can 
choose to attach a letter from the Designated School Official 
(DSO) or Responsible Officer (RO) instead of applying to the 
SSA for an SSN. The letter must clearly state that you won’t be 
securing employment while in the United States and your 
presence here is solely study related. This letter can be 
submitted instead of a Social Security Administration denial 
letter if you’re filing a tax return with this Form W-7 or claiming 
Exception 2  (explained later).
Nonresident alien students and exchange visitors, their 
spouses, and dependents under the Student Exchange Visitors 
Program (SEVP) claiming Exception 2 (no tax return attached) 
can have their original ID certified by an SEVP-approved 
institution, rather than mailing originals to the IRS. These are 
individuals admitted to the United States under an F , J, or M visa 
who receive taxable scholarships, fellowships, or other grants.
If you check this box to claim an exception under the benefits 
of a U.S. income tax treaty with a foreign country, also check box 
h. On the dotted line next to box h, enter the appropriate 
designation for Exception 2 , explained later. Identify the 
exception by its number, alpha subsection, and category under 
which you’re applying (for example, enter “Exception 
2b-Scholarship Income and claiming tax treaty benefits” or 
“Exception 2c-Scholarship Income”). Also, enter the name of the 
treaty country and the treaty article number in the appropriate 
entry spaces below box h (if applicable) and attach the 
documents required under Exception 2 .
g. Dependent/spouse of a nonresident alien holding a U.S. 
visa. This is an individual who can be claimed as a dependent 
for any tax year, or is a spouse on a U.S. federal tax return for a 
tax year before 2018, who is unable, or not eligible, to get an 
SSN, and who has entered the United States with a nonresident 
alien who holds a U.S. visa. If you apply for an ITIN under this 
category, remember to attach a copy of your visa to your Form 
W-7 and include a date of entry into the United States on line 6d.
Dependents and spouses can be claimed as personal 
exemptions only for tax years prior to 2018.
h. Other. If the reason for your ITIN request isn’t described in 
boxes a through g, check this box. Describe in detail your reason 
for requesting an ITIN and attach supporting documents.
Frequently, third parties (such as banks and other financial 
institutions) that are subject to information-reporting and 
withholding requirements will request an ITIN from you to enable 
them to file information returns required by law. If you’re 
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -7-Page 8 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
requesting an ITIN for this reason, you may be able to claim one 
of the exceptions described later. Enter on the dotted line next to 
box h the exception that applies to you. Identify the exception by 
its number, alpha subsection (if applicable), and category under 
which you’re applying (for example, enter “Exception 
1a-Partnership Income” or “Exception 3-Mortgage Interest”). 
Examples of completed Forms W-7 for “Exceptions” can be 
found in Pub. 1915. Y ou won’t need to attach a tax return to your 
Form W-7.
Exception 1. Passive income—third-party withholding or 
tax treaty benefits. This exception may apply if you’re the 
recipient of partnership income, interest income, annuity income, 
rental income, or other passive income that’s subject to 
third-party withholding or covered by tax treaty benefits. See 
Exceptions T ables , later, for more details on Exception 1.
Information returns applicable to Exception 1 may include the 
following.
•Form 1042-S, Foreign Person’s U.S. Source Income Subject 
to Withholding.
•Form 1099-INT , Interest Income.
•Form 1099-MISC, Miscellaneous Information.
•Form 8805, Foreign Partner’s Information Statement of 
Section 1446 Withholding T ax.
•Schedule K-1 (Form 1065), Partner’s Share of Income, 
Deductions, Credits, etc.
Applicants receiving compensation for personal services 
performed in the United States, or issued a U.S. visa 
that’s valid for employment, should first apply for an SSN 
with the SSA. Unless you’re denied an SSN by the SSA and 
attach the denial letter to your Form W-7, you aren’t eligible for 
an ITIN.
If you’re required to file a federal tax return, then you 
aren’t eligible for Exception 1.
Exception 2. Other income. This exception may apply if:
1.Y ou’re claiming the benefits of a U.S. income tax treaty 
with a foreign country and you receive any of the following.
a.Wages, salary, compensation, and honoraria payments;
b.Scholarships, fellowships, and grants; and/or
c.Gambling income; or
2.Y ou’re receiving taxable scholarship, fellowship, or grant 
income, but not claiming the benefits of an income tax treaty.
See Exceptions T ables , later, for more details on Exception 2. 
Information returns applicable to Exception 2 may include Form 
1042-S.
Exception 3. Mortgage interest—third-party reporting. 
This exception may apply if you have a home mortgage loan on 
real property you own in the United States that’s subject to 
third-party reporting of mortgage interest. See Exceptions 
T ables , later, for more details on Exception 3. Information returns 
applicable to Exception 3 may include Form 1098, Mortgage 
Interest Statement.
Exception 4. Dispositions by a foreign person of U.S. real 
property interest—third-party withholding. This exception 
may apply if you’re a party to a disposition of a U.S. real property 
interest by a foreign person, which is generally subject to 
withholding by the transferee or buyer (withholding agent). This 
exception may also apply if you have a notice of non-recognition 
under Regulations section 1.1445-2(d)(2). See Exceptions 
T ables , later, for more details on Exception 4.
Information returns applicable to Exception 4 may include the 
following.
•Form 8288, U.S. Withholding T ax Return for Certain 
Dispositions by Foreign Persons.
CAUTION!
CAUTION!•Form 8288-A, Statement of Withholding on Certain 
Dispositions by Foreign Persons.
•Form 8288-B, Application for Withholding Certificate for 
Dispositions by Foreign Persons of U.S. Real Property Interests.
Exception 5. Treasury Decision (T.D.) 9363. This exception 
may apply if you have an IRS reporting requirement as a 
non-U.S. representative of a foreign corporation who needs to 
obtain an ITIN for the purpose of meeting their e-filing 
requirement under T .D. 9363 and you are submitting Form W-7. 
See Exceptions T ables , later, for more details on Exception 5.
If you’re applying for an ITIN under this exception, enter 
“Exception 5, T .D. 9363” on the dotted line next to box h.
Line Instructions
Enter “N/A” (not applicable) on all sections of each line that don’t 
apply to you. Don’t  leave any section blank. For example, line 4 
should have three separate entries.
Line 1a. Enter your legal name on line 1a as it appears on your 
identifying documents. Be sure to properly identify your first, 
middle, and last names. This entry should reflect your name as 
it’ll appear on a U.S. federal tax return.
Note. If you’re renewing your ITIN and your legal name has 
changed since the original assignment of your ITIN, you’ll need 
to submit documentation to support your legal name change, 
such as your marriage certificate or a court order, which may 
include a divorce decree. Attach supporting documentation to 
Form W-7.
Y our ITIN will be established using this name. If you don’t 
use this name on the U.S. federal tax return, the 
processing of the U.S. federal tax return may be delayed.
Line 1b. Enter your name as it appears on your birth certificate 
if it’s different from your entry on line 1a.
Line 2. Enter your complete mailing address on line 2. This is 
the address the IRS will use to return your original documents 
and send written notification of your ITIN application status.
The IRS won’t use the address you enter to update its records 
for other purposes unless you include a U.S. federal tax return 
with your Form W-7. If you aren’t including a U.S. federal tax 
return with your Form W-7 and you changed your home mailing 
address since you filed your last U.S. federal tax return, also file 
Form 8822, Change of Address, with the IRS at the address 
listed in the Form 8822 instructions.
Note. If the U.S. Postal Service won’t deliver mail to your 
physical location, enter the U.S. Postal Service’s post office box 
number for your mailing address. Contact your local U.S. Post 
Office for more information. Don’t use a post office box owned 
and operated by a private firm or company.
Line 3. Enter your complete foreign (non-U.S.) address in the 
country where you permanently or normally reside, even if it’s the 
same as the address on line 2. If you no longer have a 
permanent foreign residence due to your relocation to the United 
States, enter only the foreign country where you last resided on 
line 3. If you’re claiming a benefit under an income tax treaty with 
the United States, the income tax treaty country must be the 
same as the country listed on line 3.
If you choose reason b, you must  provide a complete 
foreign address on line 3.
Don’t use a post office box or an “in care of” (c/o) 
address instead of a street address on line 2 if you’re 
entering just a “country” name on line 3. If you do, your 
application may be rejected.
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
-8- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 9 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Line 4. Enter your date of birth in the month/day/year (MM/DD/
YYYY) format, where MM = 1 to 12 and DD = 1 to 31. T o be 
eligible for an ITIN, your birth country must be recognized as a 
foreign country by the U.S. Department of State.
Line 6a. Enter the country or countries (in the case of dual 
citizenship) in which you’re a citizen. Enter the complete country 
name; don’t abbreviate.
Line 6b. If your country of residence for tax purposes has 
issued you a tax identification number, enter that number on 
line 6b. For example, if you’re a resident of Canada, enter your 
Canadian social security number (known as the Canadian Social 
Insurance Number).
Line 6c. Enter only U.S. nonimmigrant visa information. Include 
the USCIS classification, number of the U.S. visa, and the 
expiration date in month/day/year format. For example, if you 
have an F-1/F-2 visa with the number 123456, enter, in the entry 
space, F-1/F-2 and 123456, followed by the visa’s expiration 
date in MM/DD/YYYY format. Individuals in possession of an 
I-20/I-94 document(s) should attach a copy to their Form W-7.
Line 6d. Check the box indicating the type of document(s) 
you’re submitting to prove your identity. Enter the name of the 
state or country or other issuer, the identification number (if any) 
appearing on the document(s), the expiration date, and the date 
on which you entered the United States. Dates must be entered 
in the month/day/year format.
Note. If you’re submitting a passport, or a certified copy of a 
passport from the issuing agency, no other documentation is 
required to prove your identity and foreign status. Ensure any 
visa information shown on the passport is entered on line 6c and 
the pages of the passport showing the U.S. visa (if a visa is 
required for your Form W-7) are included with your Form W-7. A 
passport that doesn’t have a date of entry into the United States 
will no longer be accepted as a stand-alone identification 
document for dependents, unless the dependents are from 
Canada, Mexico, or are dependents of U.S. military personnel 
stationed overseas.
If you’re submitting more than one document, enter only the 
information for the first document on this line. Attach a separate 
sheet showing the required information for the additional 
document(s). On the separate sheet, be sure to write your name 
and “Form W-7” at the top.
The “Date of entry into the United States” must contain 
the complete date on which you entered the country for 
the purpose for which you’re requesting an ITIN (if 
applicable). If you’ve never entered the United States, enter 
“Never entered the United States” on this line. A passport 
without an entry date doesn’t prove U.S. residency and may not 
be used as a stand-alone document for certain dependents. See 
Supporting Documentation Requirements , earlier.
Example. Y ou entered the United States last year to work. 
Y ou want to file a tax return for the income you earned in the 
United States that year. Y ou aren’t eligible to get a social security 
number. Y ou file Form W-7 with your tax return for that year. On 
line 6d of your Form W-7, enter, as the “Date of entry into the 
United States,” the month, day, and year you entered the United 
States in MM/DD/YYYY format.
Line 6e. If you ever received an ITIN and/or an Internal Revenue 
Service Number (IRSN), check the “Y es” box and complete 
line 6f. If you never had an ITIN or an IRSN, or if you don’t know 
your ITIN or IRSN, check the No/Don’t know  box.
An IRSN is a nine-digit number issued by the IRS to persons 
who file a return or make a payment without providing a taxpayer 
identification number. Y ou would’ve been issued this number if 
you filed a U.S. federal tax return and didn’t have an SSN. This 
CAUTION!IRSN will appear on any correspondence the IRS sent you 
concerning that return.
If you’re submitting Form W-7 to renew your ITIN, you must 
include your previously assigned ITIN on line 6f to avoid delays 
in processing your Form W-7.
Line 6f. If you have an ITIN and/or an IRSN, list them in the 
space(s) provided. Identify your first, middle, and last name 
under which the ITIN and/or IRSN was issued. If you were issued 
more than one IRSN, attach a separate sheet listing all the 
IRSNs you received. On the separate sheet, be sure to write your 
name and “Form W-7” at the top.
If you’re submitting Form W-7 to renew your ITIN, the name 
under which you applied for your ITIN must be included on line 6f 
to avoid delays in processing your Form W-7.
Note. If you’re renewing your ITIN and your legal name has 
changed since the original assignment of your ITIN, you’ll need 
to submit documentation to support your legal name change, 
such as your marriage certificate or a court order, which may 
include a divorce decree. Attach supporting documentation to 
Form W-7.
Line 6g. If you checked reason f, you must enter the name of 
the educational institution and the city and state in which it’s 
located. Y ou must also enter your length of stay in the United 
States.
If you’re temporarily in the United States for business 
purposes, you must enter the name of the company with whom 
you’re conducting your business and the city and state in which 
it’s located. Y ou must also enter your length of stay in the United 
States.
Signature
Who Can Sign Form W-7
Generally, the applicant is required to sign Form W-7. The 
following are exceptions to this requirement.
Applicant is a dependent under 18 years of age. If the 
applicant is a dependent under 18 years of age, his or her parent 
or court-appointed guardian can sign if the child can’t sign. The 
parent or court-appointed guardian must type or print his or her 
name in the space provided and check the appropriate box that 
indicates his or her relationship to the applicant. If the individual 
is signing as a court-appointed guardian, a copy of the 
court-appointment papers showing the legal guardianship must 
be attached.
Adults, other than a parent or court-appointed guardian, can 
sign Form W-7 only if a Form 2848, Power of Attorney and 
Declaration of Representative, has been signed by a parent or 
court-appointed guardian authorizing the individual to sign for 
the applicant.
Applicant is a dependent 18 years of age or older. If an 
applicant is 18 years of age or older, the applicant or a 
court-appointed guardian can sign or appoint a parent or another 
individual to sign. The individual (if other than the applicant) 
must type or print their name in the space provided and check 
the appropriate box that indicates their relationship to the 
applicant. If the individual is signing as a court-appointed 
guardian, a copy of the court-appointment papers showing the 
legal guardianship must be attached. Individuals other than the 
applicant or a court-appointed guardian must attach a Form 
2848 from the applicant or court-appointed guardian authorizing 
them to sign the Form W-7.
A spouse can’t  sign for his or her spouse, unless the 
Power of attorney  box is checked and Form 2848 has 
been attached to Form W-7.
CAUTION!
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -9-Page 10 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Applicant can’t sign their name. If an applicant can’t sign his 
or her name, then the applicant must sign his or her mark (for 
example, an “X” or a thumbprint) in the presence of a witness. 
The witness’s signature is also required and must be identified 
as that of a witness.
Note. All Powers of Attorney (POAs) submitted to the IRS must 
be in English. Any POAs received in a foreign language will be 
considered invalid unless accompanied by a certified English 
translation. The POA must clearly state the purpose for which it’s 
intended under the Acts authorized  section. For more 
information, go to IRS.gov.
Acceptance Agent’s Use ONL Y
Complete all fields as appropriate and enter the eight-digit office 
code that was issued to you by the ITIN Program Office.
Paperwork Reduction Act Notice. We ask for the information 
on this form to carry out the Internal Revenue laws of the United 
States. Y ou are required to give us the information. We need it to ensure that you are complying with these laws and to allow us to 
figure and collect the right amount of tax.
Y ou are not required to provide the information requested on 
a form that is subject to the Paperwork Reduction Act unless the 
form displays a valid OMB control number. Books or records 
relating to a form or its instructions must be retained as long as 
their contents may become material in the administration of any 
Internal Revenue law. Generally, tax returns and return 
information are confidential, as required by Internal Revenue 
Code section 6103.
The average time and expenses required to complete and file 
this form will vary depending on individual circumstances. For 
the estimated averages, see the instructions for your income tax 
return.
If you have suggestions for making this form simpler, we 
would be happy to hear from you. See the instructions for your 
income tax return.
-10- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 11 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables
Exception #1
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
Third-Party 
Withholding on 
Passive IncomePersons who are eligible to claim Exception 1 include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 1:
1(a)  Individuals who are partners of a U.S. or foreign 
partnership that invests in the United States and that owns 
assets that generate income subject to IRS 
information-reporting and federal tax withholding 
requirements; or1(a)  A copy of the portion of the partnership or LLC 
agreement displaying the partnership’s employer 
identification number and showing that you’re a partner in 
the partnership that’s conducting business in the United 
States.
1(b)  Individuals who have opened an interest-bearing 
bank deposit account that generates income that’s 
effectively connected with their U.S. trade or business and 
is subject to IRS information reporting and/or federal tax 
withholding; or1(b)  An original signed letter from the bank on its official 
letterhead, displaying your name and stating that you’ve 
opened a business account that’s subject to IRS information 
reporting and/or federal tax withholding on the interest 
generated during the current tax year.
1(c)  Individuals who are “resident aliens” for tax purposes 
and have opened an interest-bearing bank deposit 
account that generates income subject to IRS information 
reporting and/or federal tax withholding; or1(c)  An original signed letter from the bank on its official 
letterhead, displaying your name and stating that you’ve 
opened an individual deposit account that’s subject to IRS 
information reporting and/or federal tax withholding on the 
interest generated during the current tax year.
1(d)  Individuals who are receiving distributions during the 
current tax year of income such as pensions, annuities, 
rental income, royalties, dividends, etc., and are required 
to provide an ITIN to the withholding agent (for example, 
an investment company, insurance company, financial 
institution, etc.) for the purposes of tax withholding and/or 
reporting requirements.1(d)  An original document or signed letter from the 
withholding agent, on official letterhead, showing your name 
and verifying that an ITIN is required to make distributions to 
you during the current tax year that are subject to IRS 
information reporting and/or federal tax withholding. 
Self-generated income statements will only be accepted with 
a copy of the contract or a letter with a postmarked envelope 
addressed from the withholding agent.
Exception #2
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
2(a). Wages, 
Salary, 
Compensation, 
and Honoraria 
PaymentsPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 2(a) 
include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 2(a):
Individuals claiming the benefits of a tax treaty who:
Claiming the 
benefits of a tax 
treaty•Are either exempt or subject to a reduced rate of 
withholding of tax on their wages, salary, compensation, 
and honoraria payments;
 
and
•Will be submitting Form 8233 to the payer of the income.•An original letter of employment from the payer of the 
income; or
•A copy of the employment contract; or
•A letter requesting your presence for a speaking 
engagement, etc.;
along with:
•Evidence (information) on the Form W-7 that you’re 
entitled to claim the benefits of a tax treaty, and
•A copy of the completed withholding agent’s portion of 
Form 8233 attached to Form W-7.
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -11-Page 12 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables (continued)
Exception #2 (continued)
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
2(b). 
Scholarships, 
Fellowships, 
and GrantsPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 2(b) 
include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 2(b):
Individuals claiming the benefits of a tax treaty who:
Claiming the 
benefits of a tax 
treaty•Are either exempt from or subject to a reduced rate of 
tax on their income from scholarships, fellowships, or 
grants (that is, foreign students, scholars, professors, 
researchers, foreign visitors, or any other individual);
 
and
•Will be submitting Form W-8BEN to the withholding 
agent.•An original letter or official notification from the college or 
university awarding the noncompensatory scholarship, 
fellowship, or grant; or
•A copy of a contract with a college, university, or 
educational institution;
along with:
 
 
Note.  Student and Exchange Visitor Program 
(SEVP)-approved institutions for nonresident alien 
students and exchange visitors and their spouses and 
dependents classified under section 101(a)(15)(F), (M), or 
(J) of the Immigration and Nationality Act {8 U.S.C. 1101(a)
(15)(F), (M), or (J)}: A certification letter is required for 
each Form W-7 application: primary, associated 
secondary (spouse), and dependent(s).1
 
 
1 The original certification letter from an SEVP-approved 
institution serves as a substitute for submission of original 
supporting identification documents with Form W-7. The 
certification letter must:
•Be on original, official college, university, or institution 
letterhead with a verifiable address;
•Provide the applicant’s full name and Student Exchange 
Visitor’s Information System (SEVIS) number;
•Certify the applicant’s registration in SEVIS; 
•Certify that the student presented an unexpired 
passport, visa, or other identification documents for review 
(Exception: a U.S. visa isn’t required if the foreign address 
is in Canada or Mexico);
•List the identification documents provided to verify 
identity and foreign status;
•Be signed and dated by an SEVIS official: Principal 
Designated School Official (PDSO), Designated School 
Official (DSO), Responsible Officer (RO), or Alternate 
Responsible Officer (ARO) of a certified school exchange 
program with a verifiable contact telephone number;
•Attach copies of documents used to verify the 
applicant’s identity and foreign status from the approved 
list of documents presented in the Form W-7 instructions 
(passport must include a copy of the valid visa issued by 
the U.S. Department of State). A U.S. visa isn’t required if 
the foreign address is in Canada or Mexico;
•Attach a copy of Form DS-2019, Certificate of Eligibility 
for Exchange Visitor (J-1) Status and/or a copy of Form 
I-20, Certificate of Eligibility for Nonimmigrant Student 
Status;
•Form W-7 must include the treaty country and article 
number that supports claiming a tax treaty benefit; and
•Include a letter from the DSO or RO stating that the 
applicant won’t be securing employment in the United 
States or receiving any type of income from personal 
services.•An original or copy certified by the issuing agency of 
passport showing the valid visa issued by the U.S. 
Department of State,
•Evidence (information) on the Form W-7 that you’re 
entitled to claim the benefits of a tax treaty,
•A copy of the Form W-8BEN that was submitted to the 
withholding agent, and
•A letter from the Social Security Administration2 stating 
that you’re ineligible to receive a social security number 
(SSN).
 
 
2 If you’re a student on an F-1, J-1, or M-1 visa who won’t be 
working while studying in the United States, you won’t have 
to apply for an SSN. Y ou will be permitted to provide a letter 
from the Designated School Official (DSO) or Responsible 
Officer (RO) stating that you won’t be securing employment 
in the United States or receiving any type of income from 
personal services.
-12- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 13 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables (continued)
Exception #2 (continued)
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
2(c). 
Scholarships, 
Fellowships, 
and GrantsPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 2(c) 
include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 2(c):
Individuals (that is, foreign students, scholars, professors, 
researchers, or any other individuals) receiving 
noncompensatory income from scholarships, fellowships, 
or grants that’s subject to IRS information-reporting and/or 
withholding requirements during the current year.•An original letter or official notification from the 
educational institution (that is, college or university) awarding 
the noncompensatory scholarship, fellowship, or grant; or
•A copy of a contract with a college, university, or 
educational institution;
along with:
Not claiming 
benefits of a tax 
treaty 
 
Note.  Student and Exchange Visitor Program 
(SEVP)-approved institutions for nonresident alien 
students and exchange visitors and their spouses and 
dependents classified under section 101(a)(15)(F), (M), or 
(J) of the Immigration and Nationality Act {8 U.S.C. 1101(a)
(15)(F), (M), or (J)}: A certification letter is required for 
each Form W-7 application: primary, associated 
secondary (spouse), and dependent(s).1
 
 
1 The original certification letter from an SEVP-approved 
institution serves as a substitute for submission of original 
supporting identification documents with Form W-7. The 
certification letter must:
•Be on original, official college, university, or institution 
letterhead with a verifiable address;
•Provide the applicant’s full name and Student Exchange 
Visitor’s Information System (SEVIS) number;
•Certify the applicant’s registration in SEVIS; 
•Certify that the student presented an unexpired 
passport, visa, or other identification documents for review 
(Exception: a U.S. visa isn’t required if the foreign address 
is in Canada or Mexico);
•List the identification documents provided to verify 
identity and foreign status;
•Be signed and dated by an SEVIS official: Principal 
Designated School Official (PDSO), Designated School 
Official (DSO), Responsible Officer (RO), or Alternate 
Responsible Officer (ARO) of a certified school exchange 
program with a verifiable contact telephone number;
•Attach copies of documents used to verify the 
applicant’s identity and foreign status from the approved 
list of documents presented in the Form W-7 instructions 
(passport must include a copy of the valid visa issued by 
the U.S. Department of State). A U.S. visa isn’t required if 
the foreign address is in Canada or Mexico;
•Attach a copy of Form DS-2019, Certificate of Eligibility 
for Exchange Visitor (J-1) Status and/or a copy of Form 
I-20, Certificate of Eligibility for Nonimmigrant Student 
Status;
•Form W-7 must include the treaty country and article 
number that supports claiming a tax treaty benefit; and
•Include a letter from the DSO or RO stating that the 
applicant won’t be securing employment in the United 
States or receiving any type of income from personal 
services.•An original or copy certified by the issuing agency of 
passport showing a valid visa issued by the U.S. Department 
of State (a U.S. visa isn’t required if the foreign address is in 
Canada or Mexico);
•An original letter from the DSO or RO stating that you’re 
receiving noncompensatory income from scholarships, 
fellowships, or grants that’s subject to IRS 
information-reporting and/or federal tax withholding 
requirements during the current year (this letter must be 
attached to your Form W-7 or your application for an ITIN will 
be denied); and
•A letter from the Social Security Administration2 stating 
that you’re ineligible to receive a social security number 
(SSN).
 
 
 
2 If you’re a student on an F-1, J-1, or M-1 visa who won’t be 
working while studying in the United States, you won’t have 
to apply for an SSN. Y ou will be permitted to provide a letter 
from the DSO or RO stating that you won’t be securing 
employment in the United States or receiving any type of 
income from personal services.
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -13-Page 14 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables (continued)
Exception #2 (continued)
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
2(d). Gambling 
IncomePersons who are eligible to claim Exception 2(d) 
include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 2(d):
Nonresident aliens visiting the United States who:
Claiming the 
benefits of a tax 
treaty•Have gambling winnings,
•Are claiming the benefits of a tax treaty for an exempt or 
reduced rate of federal tax withholding on that income, and
•Will be utilizing the services of a gaming official as an 
IRS ITIN Acceptance Agent.Y our Form W-7, which must be submitted through the 
services of an appropriate gaming official serving as an IRS 
ITIN Acceptance Agent to apply for an ITIN under Exception 
2(d).
 
Note.  If you don’t secure the services of a gaming official, 
you may still file Form 1040-NR at the end of the tax year 
with a Form W-7, attaching a copy of Form 1042-S 
displaying the amount of tax withheld. Y our Form 1040-NR 
should also display the tax treaty article number and country 
under which you’re claiming the treaty benefits.
Exception #3
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
Third-Party 
Reporting of 
Mortgage 
InterestPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 3 include: Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 3:
Individuals with a home mortgage loan on real property 
located in the United States.•Documentation showing evidence of a home mortgage 
loan. This includes a copy of the contract of sale or similar 
documentation showing evidence of a home mortgage loan 
on real property located in the United States.
Exception #4
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
Third-Party 
Withholding—
Disposition by 
a Foreign 
Person of U.S. 
Real Property 
InterestPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 4 include: Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 4:
An individual who is a party to the disposition of U.S. real 
property interest by a foreign person (buyer or other 
transferee such as a withholding agent) or notice of 
non-recognition1 under Regulations section 1.1445-2(d)(2) 
from the transferor.•A completed Form 8288, Form 8288-A, or Form 8288-B; 
and
•A copy of the real estate sales contract, Settlement 
Statement (HUD-1), or Closing Disclosure.
•In the case of notice of non-recognition1, document(s) that 
evidence a transaction for which a notice of non-recognition 
is applicable.
 
Note.  For the seller of the property, copies of the sales 
contract, Settlement Statement (HUD-1), or Closing 
Disclosure, and copies of Forms 8288 and 8288-A submitted 
by the buyer need to be attached to Form W-7.
 
1 For notices of non-recognition, the document must show 
the date of the transaction, the parties involved, and the type 
of transfer that took place. For example, for transfers 
involving real estate, valid documents include the deed, 
Direction to Convey form, or a document that identifies the 
replacement property in a like-kind exchange. For transfers 
involving stock, an example of a valid document is the 
document that facilitates the transaction.
-14- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 15 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables (continued)
Exception #5
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
Reporting 
Obligations 
under T.D. 9363Persons who are eligible to claim Exception 5 include: Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 5:
A non-U.S. representative of a foreign corporation who 
needs to obtain an ITIN for the purpose of meeting their 
e-filing requirements.•Along with your Form W-7, include an original signed 
letter from your employer on corporate letterhead stating that 
an ITIN is needed for T .D. 9363, and you have been 
designated as the person responsible for ensuring 
compliance with IRS information-reporting requirements.
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -15-. 
        ===================generated constraints===========================
To extract the requirements and constraints from the provided document, let's list them comprehensively:

### Requirements

1. **Form W-7 Submission Scenarios**:
   - Apply for a new ITIN.
   - Renew an existing ITIN.

2. **General Form W-7 Requirements**:
   - Must be properly signed by the applicant or an authorized person.
   - Submit original documents or certified copies unless otherwise specified.
   - Attach a U.S. federal tax return unless claiming an exception.

3. **Supporting Documentation**:
   - Submit documentation to establish identity and foreign status.
   - Use at least one document with a photograph unless the applicant is a dependent under 14 (or under 18 if a student).
   - Acceptable documents are listed (e.g., passport, visa, U.S. driver's license, etc.).

4. **Special Cases**:
   - Dependents from Canada, Mexico, or dependents of U.S. military personnel stationed overseas have specific documentation requirements.
   - Dependent applicants must also prove U.S. residency unless from Canada, Mexico, or qualifying under U.S. military exception.
   - Spouses and dependents must provide additional documents if the passport does not have a date of entry into the U.S.

5. **Change of Address**:
   - Notify the IRS immediately if the mailing address changes before receiving the ITIN.

6. **Application Process**:
   - First-time applicants must include Form W-7 attached to the original tax return, required supporting documents, and any necessary exceptions.
   - Renewal applicants must include the expired ITIN and relevant documentation.
   
7. **Submission Methods**:
   - By mail to the designated IRS address.
   - By private delivery service to a specific IRS address.
   - In person at IRS Taxpayer Assistance Centers (TACs).
   - Through an acceptance agent or certifying acceptance agent.

8. **Documentation for Exceptions**: Specific requirements for different exceptions (such as third-party withholding on passive income, employment income, scholarships, and more) are outlined.

9. **Special Instructions for Deceased Taxpayers**:
   - Include specific documentation depending on whether it’s filed by the surviving spouse, court-appointed executor/administrator, or other.

### Constraints

1. **Documentation Constraints**:
   - Documents submitted must be originals or certified copies from issuing entities.
   - Documents must be current (not expired).
   - The passport without a date of entry is not a stand-alone document for dependents unless specific exceptions apply.

2. **Specific Situations Constraints**:
   - U.S. resident aliens must have a date of entry into the U.S.
   - Tax benefits: Spouses or dependents are not eligible unless claimed for an allowable tax benefit or filing their own tax return.
   - Names must match on supporting documents and Form W-7.

3. **Submission Constraints**:
   - Form W-7 and supporting documents must be submitted to specific addresses depending on the method of delivery.
   - Renewal of ITINs must be done before using them on U.S. federal tax returns that will include them.
   - In-person verification of documents at TACs must be by appointment only.

4. **Validity Constraints**:
   - ITINs that haven’t been used on at least one U.S. federal tax return in the last three consecutive tax years will expire on December 31 of the third consecutive year.
   - ITINs with middle digits from “70” to “88” and assigned before 2013, “90” to “99” have expired.

5. **Exception Handling Constraints**:
   - Documentation specifics are needed for each exception type outlined in the tables, including the type of income, tax treaty benefits, scholarships, etc.

6. **Tax-Related Constraints**:
   - ITINs are solely for federal tax purposes; they do not grant eligibility for social security benefits or authorize work in the U.S.

By adhering to these extracted requirements and constraints, individuals can ensure compliance with the IRS stipulations when applying for or renewing an ITIN using Form W-7.===================prompt===========================

        Your task is to convert each constaint you identified previously from a tax into cvc5 
        smt formulas. Given the form Userid: CPM Schema: instrx Leadpct: 100% Pt. size: 9 Draft  Ok to Print
AH XSL/XML Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source (Init. & Date) _______
Page 1 of 15  10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Instructions for Form W -7
(Rev. November 2023)
Application for IRS Individual Taxpayer Identification  Number
(Use with the August 2019 revision of Form W -7)
Department of the T reasury
Internal Revenue Service
Section references are to the Internal Revenue Code unless 
otherwise noted.
Contents Page
Future Developments ........................ 1
What’s New ............................... 1
Reminders ................................ 1
General Instructions ......................... 2
Purpose of Form ......................... 2
Who Is Eligible T o Complete This Form ......... 2
Additional Information ..................... 3
Supporting Documentation Requirements ...... 3
Additional Documentation Requirements ....... 4
How T o Apply ........................... 4
When T o Apply .......................... 5
Where T o Apply ......................... 6
Specific Instructions ......................... 6
Application T ype ......................... 6
Reason Y ou’re Submitting Form W-7 .......... 6
Line Instructions ......................... 8
Signature .............................. 9
Exceptions T ables .......................... 11
Future Developments
For the latest information about developments related to Form 
W-7 and its instructions, such as legislation enacted after they 
were published, go to IRS.gov/FormW7 .
What’s New
Conversion to generic dates. We converted specific dates to 
generic dates wherever possible so these instructions would 
remain applicable even in years when they aren’t updated.
Line 1a. We clarify that you should properly identify your full 
name.
Reminders
Renewal applications. All Form W-7 renewal applications must 
include a U.S. federal tax return unless you meet an exception to 
the requirement. See Exceptions T ables , later, for more 
information.Expanded discussion of allowable tax benefit. Spouses and 
dependents are not eligible for an ITIN or to renew an ITIN 
unless they are claimed for an allowable tax benefit or they file 
their own tax return. See Allowable tax benefit , later, for more 
information.
Expired ITINs. If your ITIN wasn’t included on at least one U.S. 
federal tax return for the last 3 consecutive tax years, it will expire 
on December 31 of the third consecutive tax year, and must be 
renewed before being used again on a U.S. federal tax return.
ITINs with middle digits (the fourth and fifth positions) “70,” 
“71,” “72,” “73,” “74,” “75,” “76,” “77,” “78,” “79,” “80,” “81,” “82,” 
“83,” “84,” “85,” “86,” “87,” or “88” have expired. In addition, ITINs 
with middle digits “90,” “91,” “92,” “94,” “95,” “96,” “97,” “98,” or 
“99,” IF assigned before 2013 , have expired.
If you previously submitted a renewal application and it 
was approved, you do not need to renew again. 
Otherwise, see How T o Apply , later, for more 
information.
Information returns. If your ITIN is only being used on 
information returns for reporting purposes, you don’t need to 
renew your ITIN at this time. However, in the future, if you need to 
use the ITIN to file a U.S. federal tax return, you will need to 
renew the ITIN at that time.
Dependent applicants must specify their relationship to 
the U.S. citizen/resident alien. An applicant who chooses 
reason d must enter the relationship he or she has to the U.S. 
citizen/resident alien in the designated space on Form W-7.
The passport isn’t a stand-alone document for certain de-
pendents if no date of entry into the United States is 
present. A passport that doesn’t have a date of entry into the 
United States won’t be accepted as a stand-alone identification 
document for certain dependents. See Proof of U.S. residency 
for applicants who are dependents  under Supporting 
Documentation Requirements , later, for more information.
Change of address. It’s important that the IRS is aware of your 
current mailing address. This address is used to mail notices 
about your Form W-7, including notification of your assigned 
ITIN, and return your original supporting documentation. If you 
move before you receive your ITIN, notify us of your current 
mailing address immediately, so we may update our records. Y ou 
may send a letter to the IRS using the address under Where T o 
Apply , later.
CAUTION!
Nov 1, 2023 Cat. No. 54092GPage 2 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
General Instructions
What’s an ITIN. An ITIN is a nine-digit number issued by the 
IRS to individuals who are required for federal tax purposes to 
have a U.S. taxpayer identification number but who don’t have 
and aren’t eligible to get a social security number (SSN).
Purpose of Form
Use Form W-7 for the following purposes.
•To apply for a new ITIN.  Individuals applying for an ITIN 
must include a U.S. federal tax return unless they meet an 
exception, and the required documentation.
•To renew an ITIN.  An ITIN only needs to be renewed if it’ll be 
included on a U.S. federal tax return and it’s expired. Individuals 
renewing an ITIN must include a U.S. federal tax return unless 
they meet an exception, and the required documentation. See 
How T o Apply , later, for more information on how to renew your 
ITIN.
If your ITIN is only  used on information returns filed with 
the IRS by third parties, you don’t have to renew your 
ITIN even if the ITIN has expired for purposes of filing a 
U.S. federal tax return. However, in the future, if you file an 
income tax return, you will need to renew your ITIN at that time.
The ITIN is for federal tax purposes only. An ITIN doesn’t 
entitle you to social security benefits and doesn’t change your 
immigration status or your right to work in the United States.
The ITIN can’t be used to claim certain federal tax credits. 
Individuals filing tax returns using an ITIN aren’t eligible for the 
earned income credit (EIC). Also, a child who has an ITIN can’t 
be counted as a qualifying child in figuring the amount of the EIC. 
For more information, see Pub. 596, Earned Income Credit 
(EIC). Also, for tax years 2018 through 2025, a child who has an 
ITIN can’t be claimed as a qualifying child for purposes of the 
child tax credit and the additional child tax credit. For more 
information, see Schedule 8812 (Form 1040), Credits for 
Qualifying Children and Other Dependents, and its instructions. 
If an ITIN is applied for on or before the due date of a return 
(including extensions) and the IRS issues an ITIN as a result of 
the application, the IRS will consider the ITIN as issued on or 
before the due date of the return. See the instructions for your 
U.S. federal tax return for more information.
The ITIN may not be required for an electing small busi-
ness trust (ESBT) election. A nonresident alien who is a 
potential current beneficiary of an ESBT and who is not 
otherwise required to have a taxpayer identification number for 
U.S. tax purposes does not need a taxpayer identification 
number to make a valid ESBT election.
Social security numbers. Don’t complete Form W-7 if you 
have an SSN or if you’re eligible to get an SSN. Y ou’re eligible for 
an SSN if you’re a U.S. citizen or if you’ve been admitted by the 
United States for permanent residence or U.S. employment.
T o get an SSN, see Form SS-5, Application for a Social 
Security Card. T o get Form SS-5 or to find out if you’re eligible to 
get an SSN, go to SSA.gov  or contact a Social Security 
Administration (SSA) office.
If you have an application for an SSN pending, don’t file Form 
W-7. Complete Form W-7 only if the SSA notifies you that you’re 
ineligible for an SSN.
If the SSA determines that you’re not eligible for an SSN, you 
must get a letter of denial and attach it to your Form W-7. This 
applies whether you’re attaching Form W-7 to your U.S. federal 
tax return or not. However, students, professors, and 
researchers, see information for box f , later.
Once you are issued an SSN, use it to file your tax return. Use 
your SSN to file your tax return even if your SSN does not 
CAUTION!authorize employment or if you have been issued an SSN that 
authorizes employment and you lose your employment 
authorization. An ITIN will not be issued to you once you have 
been issued an SSN. If you received your SSN after previously 
using an ITIN, stop using your ITIN. Use your SSN instead.
Allowable tax benefit. For tax years after December 31, 2017, 
spouses and dependents are NOT  eligible for an ITIN or to 
renew an ITIN unless they are claimed for an allowable tax 
benefit or they file their own tax return. Spouses and dependents 
must be listed on an attached U.S. federal tax return and include 
the schedule or form that applies to the allowable tax benefit. An 
allowable tax benefit includes a spouse filing a joint return, head 
of household (HOH) , American opportunity tax credit (AOTC) , 
premium tax credit (PTC) , child and dependent care credit 
(CDCC) , or credit for other dependents (ODC) .
Head of household (HOH). If Form W-7 is submitted to 
claim the HOH filing status, then an attached tax return that lists 
the applicant as a dependent is required. Dependent applicants 
must be your qualifying children or qualifying relatives and must 
either:
•Have lived with you for more than half the year (including 
temporary absences), or
•Be your parent.
See Pub. 501 for more information.
An ITIN will not be assigned or renewed for an HOH 
qualifying person who is not also claimed as a 
dependent on an attached tax return.
American opportunity tax credit (AOTC). If Form W-7 is 
submitted to claim the AOTC, then an attached tax return and 
Form 8863 that list the applicant are required. Dependent 
applicants must be qualifying children or qualifying relatives of 
the taxpayer who claims the AOTC. See Pub. 970 for more 
information.
Premium tax credit (PTC). If Form W-7 is submitted to claim 
the PTC, then an attached tax return that lists the applicant and 
Form 8962 are required. See Pub. 974 for more information.
Child and dependent care credit (CDCC). If Form W-7 is 
submitted to claim the CDCC, then an attached tax return and 
Form 2441 that list the applicant as a qualifying person are 
required. See Pub. 503 for more information.
Credit for other dependents (ODC). If Form W-7 is 
submitted to claim the ODC, the applicant must be listed on an 
attached tax return with the “Credit for other dependents” box 
checked next to their name. Dependent applicants must be your 
qualifying children or qualifying relatives who are U.S. residents 
or U.S. nationals. See Schedule 8812 (Form 1040) and its 
instructions for more information.
Who Is Eligible To Complete This 
Form
The following individuals are eligible to complete Form W-7.
1.Any individual who isn’t eligible to get an SSN but who 
must furnish a taxpayer identification number for U.S. tax 
purposes or to file a U.S. federal tax return must apply for an ITIN 
on Form W-7. Examples include the following.
•A nonresident alien individual claiming reduced withholding 
under an applicable income tax treaty for which an ITIN is 
required (see Regulations section 1.1441-1(e)(4)(vii)(A)). Also 
see Pub. 515, Withholding of T ax on Nonresident Aliens and 
Foreign Entities.
•A nonresident alien individual not eligible for an SSN who is 
required to file a U.S. federal tax return or who is filing a U.S. 
federal tax return only to claim a refund.
•A nonresident alien individual not eligible for an SSN who 
elects to file a joint U.S. federal tax return with a spouse who is a 
U.S. citizen or resident alien. See Pub. 519, U.S. T ax Guide for 
Aliens.
CAUTION!
-2- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 3 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
•A U.S. resident alien (based on the number of days present in 
the United States, known as the “substantial presence” test) who 
files a U.S. federal tax return but who isn’t eligible for an SSN. 
For information about the substantial presence test, see Pub. 
519.
•A nonresident alien student, professor, or researcher who is 
required to file a U.S. federal tax return but who isn’t eligible for 
an SSN, or who is claiming an exception to the tax return filing 
requirement. See Pub. 519.
•An alien spouse claimed as an exemption on a U.S. federal 
tax return who isn’t eligible to get an SSN. See Pub. 501, 
Dependents, Standard Deduction, and Filing Information, and 
Pub. 519.
A spouse can be claimed as an exemption only for tax 
years prior to 2018.
•An alien individual eligible to be claimed as a dependent on a 
U.S. federal tax return but who isn’t eligible to get an SSN. Y our 
spouse is never considered your dependent. For more 
information about whether an alien individual is eligible to be 
claimed as a dependent on a U.S. federal tax return, see Pubs. 
501 and 519.
Dependents can be claimed as exemptions only for tax 
years prior to 2018.
•A dependent/spouse of a nonresident alien U.S. visa holder 
who isn’t eligible for an SSN. See Pub. 519.
Dependents and spouses can be claimed as exemptions 
only for tax years prior to 2018.
Note. The deduction for personal exemptions was suspended 
for tax years 2018 through 2025. For tax years beginning after 
2017, spouses or dependents aren’t eligible for an ITIN, unless 
they are claimed for an allowable tax benefit. The individual must 
be listed on an attached U.S. federal tax return with the schedule 
or form that applies to the allowable tax benefit. See the 
instructions for your U.S. federal tax return for more information.
2.Persons who must renew their ITIN to file a U.S. federal 
tax return. See Renewal of an existing ITIN  under How T o Apply , 
later.
Additional Information
For more information, visit IRS.gov/ITIN .
Publications. See Pubs. 501, 515, 519, and 1915 for more 
information.
Y ou can visit IRS.gov/Forms  to download these publications 
as well as other forms at no cost. Otherwise, you can go to 
IRS.gov/OrderForms  to order current and prior-year forms and 
instructions. Y our order should be mailed to you within 10 
business days. Y ou can also call 800-TAX-FORM 
(800-829-3676) if you’re in the United States to order forms and 
publications.
Telephone help. If, after reading these instructions and our free 
publications, you’re not sure how to complete your application or 
have additional questions, call 800-829-1040 if you’re in the 
United States. If you’re outside of the United States, call 
267-941-1000 (not a toll-free number) for assistance.
Supporting Documentation 
Requirements
Whether you are applying for a new ITIN or renewing an existing 
ITIN, you must provide documentation that meets the following 
requirements.
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
CAUTION!1.Y ou must submit documentation to establish your identity 
and your connection to a foreign country (“foreign status”). 
Applicants claimed as dependents must also prove U.S. 
residency unless the applicant is from Canada or Mexico or the 
applicant is a dependent of U.S. military personnel stationed 
overseas.
2.Y ou must submit original documents, or certified copies of 
these documents from the issuing agency, that support the 
information provided on Form W-7. A certified copy of a 
document is one that the original issuing agency  provides and 
certifies as an exact copy of the original document and contains 
an official stamped seal from the agency. Y ou may be able to 
request a certified copy of documents at an embassy or 
consulate. However, services may vary between countries, so it’s 
recommended that you contact the appropriate consulate or 
embassy for specific information.
Original documents you submit will be returned to you at 
the mailing address shown on your Form W-7. Y ou don’t 
need to provide a return envelope. Applicants are 
permitted to include a prepaid Express Mail or courier envelope 
for faster return delivery of their documents and to ensure the 
secure delivery of valuable documents, such as passports. The 
IRS will then return the documents in the envelope provided by 
the applicant. If your original documents aren’t returned within 60 
days, you can call the IRS (see T elephone help , earlier). If you 
will need your documents for any purpose within 60 days of 
submitting your ITIN application, you may wish to apply in person 
at an IRS T axpayer Assistance Center or a CAA. See Where T o 
Apply , later.
3.The documentation you provide must be current (that is, 
not expired).
There are 13 acceptable documents, as shown in the 
following table. At least one document must contain your 
photograph, unless you’re a dependent under age 14 (under age 
18 if a student). Y ou may later be required by the IRS to provide a 
certified translation of foreign-language documents.
TIP
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -3-Page 4 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Supporting DocumentationCan be used to 
establish:
Foreign 
statusIdentity
Passport (the only stand-alone document*) x x
U.S. Citizenship and Immigration Services (USCIS) 
photo identification x x
Visa issued by the U.S. Department of State x x
U.S. driver’s license x
U.S. military identification card x
Foreign driver’s license x
Foreign military identification card x x
National identification card (must contain name, 
photograph, address, date of birth, and expiration date) x x
U.S. state identification card x
Foreign voter’s registration card x x
Civil birth certificate x** x
Medical records (valid only for dependents under age 6) x** x
School records (valid only for a dependent under age 
18, if a student) x** x
* Applicants claimed as dependents who need to prove U.S. residency must 
provide additional original documentation if the passport doesn’t have a date 
of entry into the United States. See Proof of U.S. residency for applicants who 
are dependents  below.
** May be used to establish foreign status only if documents are foreign.
If you submit an original valid passport or a certified copy from 
the issuing agency, you don’t need to submit any other 
documents from the table, unless the passport is for a 
dependent and it doesn’t include a date of entry into the United 
States.
Proof of U.S. residency for applicants who are 
dependents. A passport that doesn’t have a date of entry into 
the United States won’t be accepted as a stand-alone 
identification document for dependents, unless they are from 
Canada or Mexico, or are dependents of U.S. military personnel 
stationed overseas. In these cases, applicants will be required to 
submit at least one of the following original documents in 
addition to the passport to prove U.S. residency.
•If under 6 years of age:  A U.S. medical record, U.S. school 
record, or U.S. state identification card that lists the applicant’s 
name and U.S. address, or a U.S. visa.
•If at least 6 years of age but under 18 years of age:  A U.S. 
school record, U.S. state identification card or driver’s license 
that lists the applicant’s name and U.S. address, or a U.S. visa.
•If 18 years of age or older:  A U.S. school record, rental 
statement from a U.S. property, utility bill for a U.S. property, or a 
U.S. bank statement, U.S. state identification card or driver’s 
license that lists the applicant’s name and U.S. address, or a 
U.S. visa.
If you check box d for a dependent of a U.S. citizen or 
resident alien, then you may submit an original valid passport (or 
a certified copy from the issuing agency) without any other 
documents to prove your “foreign status” or “identity” only if the 
passport has a date of entry into the United States. Otherwise, 
you must submit one of the additional documents listed earlier in 
the “Supporting Documentation” table with your passport to 
prove residency. If you don’t have one of the additional 
documents listed earlier in the “Supporting Documentation” table 
to submit with your passport, you can’t use your passport as a 
stand-alone supporting document and must submit at least two 
types of documents listed in the “Supporting Documentation” table that prove residency, identity, and foreign status, and that 
meet the photograph requirement explained earlier.
Additional Documentation Requirements
Civil birth certificate. An original birth certificate is required 
if the applicant is under age 18 and hasn’t provided a valid 
passport. Civil birth certificates are considered current at all 
times because they don’t contain an expiration date.
Passports and national identification cards. These 
documents will be considered current only if their expiration date 
hasn’t passed prior to the date the Form W-7 is submitted.
Note. Certified copies of a passport from the issuing agency 
must include the U.S. visa pages if a visa is required for your 
Form W-7 application.
Medical records. Medical records will be accepted for 
dependents under 6 years of age. A medical record consists 
only of a shot/immunization record that documents the patient's 
name and chronological dates of the patient's medical history 
and care. The medical record must contain the child’s name, 
date of birth, and verifiable address. Shot/immunization records 
will be accepted only if they document the applicant’s name and 
chronological dates of the applicant’s medical history and care. 
In addition, the medical record must document the name, 
address, and phone number of the doctor, hospital, or clinic 
where treatment was last administered. If this information isn’t 
printed on the medical record, the medical record must be 
accompanied by a dated letter providing the required information 
on official letterhead from the federal authority, physician, 
hospital, or clinic that administered the latest care of the child. 
The medical record must be dated no more than 12 months 
before the date of the Form W-7 application. If the passport 
doesn’t have a date of entry into the United States, the medical 
record must be from a U.S. facility, unless the applicant is a 
dependent of U.S. military personnel stationed overseas or is 
from Canada or Mexico and the applicant is claimed for an 
allowable tax benefit.
School records. School records will be accepted only if they 
are for a school term ending no more than 12 months from the 
date of the Form W-7 application. The school record must 
consist of an official report card or transcript issued by the 
school or the equivalent of a Ministry of Education. The school 
record must also be signed by a school official or ministry 
official. The record must be dated and contain the student’s 
name, coursework with grades (unless under age 6), date of 
grading period(s) (unless under age 6) for a term ending no more 
than 12 months from the date of the Form W-7 application, and 
school name and address. If the passport doesn’t have a date of 
entry into the United States, the school record must be from a 
U.S. facility, unless the applicant is a dependent of U.S. military 
personnel stationed overseas or is from Canada or Mexico and 
the applicant is claimed for an allowable tax benefit.
How To Apply
Follow the guidelines below if you’re applying for a new ITIN or 
renewing an existing ITIN.
For your convenience, you can access fillable Form W-7 
at IRS.gov/pub/irs-pdf/fw7.pdf , complete, print, then sign 
the Form W-7.
Note. Keep a copy of your application for your records.
Applying for an ITIN for the first time. If you’ve never had an 
ITIN before and are submitting an application for a new ITIN, 
include the following in your Application Package .
1.Y our completed Form W-7.
TIP
-4- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 5 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Note. If you submit a Form W-7, all future ITIN notices and 
correspondence that you receive will be in English. If you prefer 
to receive them in Spanish, submit Form W-7(SP).
2.Y our original tax return(s) for which the ITIN is needed. 
Attach Form W-7 to the front of your tax return. If you’re applying 
for more than one ITIN for the same tax return (such as for a 
spouse or dependent(s)), attach all Forms W-7 to the same tax 
return. Leave the area of the SSN blank on the tax return for 
each person who is applying for an ITIN. After your Forms W-7 
have been processed, the IRS will assign an ITIN to the return 
and process the return.
There are exceptions to the requirement to include a 
U.S. federal tax return. If you claim one of these 
exceptions, you must submit the documentation required 
instead of a tax return. See Exceptions T ables , later.
3.Original documents, or certified copies of these 
documents from the issuing agency, required to support the 
information provided on Form W-7. The required supporting 
documentation must be consistent with each applicant’s 
information provided on Form W-7. For example, the name, date 
of birth, and country(ies) of citizenship shown in the 
documentation must be the same as on Form W-7, lines 1a, 1b, 
4, and 6a. See Supporting Documentation Requirements , 
earlier, for a list of the documents to be submitted with your 
application package.
Renewal of an existing ITIN. If your ITIN has expired and the 
ITIN will be included on a U.S. federal tax return, follow the 
guidelines below to submit your renewal application. If your ITIN 
won’t be included on a U.S. federal tax return, you don’t need to 
renew your ITIN at this time.
If you don’t renew the expired ITIN and you file a 
U.S. federal tax return with the expired ITIN, there 
may be a delay in processing your tax return.
Include the following in your Renewal Application Package .
1.Y our completed Form W-7. Y ou must check a check box 
in the Application type  box at the top of page 1 indicating the 
reason you’re completing the Form W-7 even if you’re applying to 
renew your ITIN.
2.Y our original tax return(s) you’re filing, and on which the 
ITIN is listed. Attach Form W-7 to the front of your tax return. If 
you’re renewing more than one ITIN for the same tax return 
(such as for a spouse or dependent(s)), attach all Forms W-7 to 
the same tax return. After your Forms W-7 have been processed, 
the IRS will process the return.
3.Original documents, or certified copies of these 
documents from the issuing agency, required to support the 
information provided on Form W-7. The required supporting 
documentation must be consistent with each applicant’s 
information provided on Form W-7. For example, the name, date 
of birth, and country(ies) of citizenship shown in the 
documentation must be the same as on Form W-7, lines 1a, 1b, 
4, and 6a. See Supporting Documentation Requirements , 
earlier, for a list of the documents to be submitted with your 
renewal application package.
Spouses and dependents who renew their ITIN to be 
claimed for an allowable tax benefit must be listed on an 
attached U.S. federal tax return with the schedule or 
form that applies to the allowable benefit or, in the case of the 
credit for other dependents, the box next to their name must be 
checked on the attached tax return.
Certified copies. Y ou can submit copies of original documents 
if you do any of the following.
•Have the copies certified by the issuing agency.
TIP
CAUTION!
CAUTION!•Have the officers at U.S. embassies and consulates overseas 
provide certification and authentication services. Contact the 
Consular Section, American Citizens Services of the U.S. 
Embassy or Consulate in advance to determine the hours of 
operation for these services.
Deceased taxpayers. When requesting an ITIN for a deceased 
taxpayer, the deceased must meet all of the requirements 
established to get an ITIN. Also, you must write “Deceased” and 
the date of death across the top of the Form W-7 and include the 
documentation shown in the following chart.
IF you’re: THEN you must include:
The surviving spouse 
filing an original or 
amended joint return with 
their deceased spouse•Form W-7,
•A U.S. individual income tax return, and
•Documentation substantiating the identity 
and foreign status of the deceased.
The court-appointed 
executor or administrator 
of the deceased’s estate 
filing an original tax return 
on behalf of the deceased•Form W-7,
•A U.S. individual income tax return,
•Documentation substantiating the identity 
and foreign status of the deceased*, and
•A court certificate showing your appointment.
Neither the surviving 
spouse nor the 
court-appointed executor 
or administrator of the 
deceased’s estate•Form W-7,
•A U.S. individual income tax return,
•Documentation substantiating the identity 
and foreign status of the deceased*,
•Form 1310 (if a refund is due), and
•A copy of the certificate of death.
* If Form W-7 is for a deceased individual under 18 years of age, one of the 
documents proving identity, foreign status, and/or U.S. residency must be a 
birth certificate, unless a passport with a date of entry into the United States is 
submitted.
ITIN not needed for Forms 4868, 1040-ES, or 1040-ES (NR). 
If you’re filing an application for an extension of time to file using 
Form 4868, or making an estimated tax payment using Form 
1040-ES or Form 1040-ES (NR), don’t file Form W-7 with those 
forms. Enter “ITIN TO BE REQUESTED” wherever your SSN or 
ITIN is requested. An ITIN will be issued only after you file a tax 
return and meet all other requirements.
If you attached your tax return to your Form W-7, leave 
the area of the SSN blank on the new tax return for each 
person who is applying for an ITIN.
When To Apply
First-time ITIN applications. If you’re applying for a new ITIN, 
complete and attach Form W-7 to the front of your tax return and 
file your application package with your tax return for which the 
ITIN is needed on or before the due date for the return. If you’re 
unable to file your tax return by the due date, you must file an 
application for an extension of time to file by the due date of the 
return. Failure to timely file the tax return with a complete Form 
W-7 and required documentation may result in the denial of 
refundable credits, such as the additional child tax credit 
(available for tax years prior to 2018) and the American 
opportunity tax credit, if you otherwise qualify. Don’t file your tax 
return without Form W-7 and required documentation.
If you meet one of the exceptions described in Exceptions 
T ables  at the end of these instructions, you may complete and 
submit Form W-7 at any time.
Y ou can’t electronically file ( e-file ) a return using an ITIN 
in the calendar year the ITIN is assigned. If you need to 
file multiple-year returns, you can attach them all to your 
Form W-7 and submit them to the IRS using one of the methods 
described later in Where T o Apply . Once your ITIN is assigned, 
you can e-file returns in the following years. For example, if you 
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -5-Page 6 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
apply for and receive an ITIN this year, you may not e-file any tax 
return using that ITIN (including prior-year returns) until next 
year.
Renewal ITIN applications. If you’re renewing an existing ITIN, 
you must submit your Form W-7 renewal application with your 
U.S. federal tax return using one of the methods described below 
in Where T o Apply . Spouses and dependents who renew their 
ITIN must be listed on an attached U.S. federal tax return with 
the schedule or form that applies to the allowable tax benefit. If 
you don’t renew your expired ITIN and you file a U.S. federal tax 
return with the expired ITIN, there may be a delay in processing 
your tax return.
Where To Apply
By mail. Mail Form W-7, your tax return (if applicable) or other 
documents required by an exception, and the documentation 
described under Supporting Documentation Requirements , 
earlier, to:
Internal Revenue Service
ITIN Operation
P .O. Box 149342
Austin, TX 78714-9342
If you mail your application, don’t  use the mailing 
address in the instructions for your tax return (for 
example, Form 1040-NR). Y our tax return will be 
processed after it is mailed as part of your application package 
to the address in these instructions.
By private delivery services. If you use a private delivery 
service, submit your Form W-7, your tax return (if applicable) or 
other documents required by an exception, and the 
documentation described under Supporting Documentation 
Requirements , earlier, to:
Internal Revenue Service
ITIN Operation
Mail Stop 6090-AUSC
3651 S. Interregional, Hwy 35
Austin, TX 78741-0000
The private delivery service can tell you how to get written 
proof of the mailing date.
In person. Y ou can apply for your ITIN by visiting designated 
IRS T axpayer Assistance Centers (TACs). They can verify 
original documentation and certified copies of the 
documentation from the issuing agency for primary and 
secondary applicants and their dependents. For dependents, 
TACs can verify passports, national identification cards, and birth 
certificates. These documents will be returned to you 
immediately. Service at TACs is by appointment only. 
Appointments can be scheduled by calling 844-545-5640. See 
IRS.gov/W7DocumentVerification  for a list of designated TACs 
that offer ITIN document authentication service. TACs that don’t 
offer ITIN document authentication service will mail the original 
documents, Form W-7, and the tax return to the IRS Austin 
Service Center for processing.
Through an acceptance agent. Y ou can also apply through 
one of the two types of acceptance agents authorized by the 
IRS.
1.Acceptance Agent (AA).
2.Certifying Acceptance Agent (CAA).
Note. AAs and CAAs are available both domestically and 
abroad.
CAUTION!Acceptance Agent (AA). An AA can help you complete and 
file Form W-7. T o get a list of agents, visit IRS.gov and enter 
“acceptance agent program” in the search box. An AA will need 
to submit original documentation or certified copies of the 
documentation from the issuing agency to the IRS for all 
applicants.
Certifying Acceptance Agent (CAA). A CAA can verify 
original documentation and certified copies of the 
documentation from the issuing agency for primary and 
secondary applicants and their dependents, except for foreign 
military identification cards. For dependents, CAAs can only 
verify passports and birth certificates. The CAA will return the 
documentation immediately after reviewing its authenticity.
Processing times. Allow 7 weeks for the IRS to notify you of 
your ITIN application status (9 to 11 weeks if you submit the 
application during peak processing periods (January 15 through 
April 30) or if you’re filing from overseas). If you haven’t received 
your ITIN or correspondence at the end of that time, you can call 
the IRS to find out the status of your application (see T elephone 
help , earlier).
Specific Instructions
If you’re completing this form for someone else, answer the 
questions as they apply to that individual.
Application Type
Check the applicable box to indicate if you’re:
1.a first-time applicant applying for a new  ITIN, or
2.seeking to renew  an ITIN that you already have.
If you check Renew an existing ITIN , you must answer the 
question on line 6e and include your ITIN information on line 6f. 
See the instructions for lines 6e and 6f for more information.
Reason You’re Submitting Form W-7
You must check the box to indicate the reason you’re 
completing Form W-7 even if you’re applying to renew your 
ITIN.  If more than one box applies to you, check the box that 
best explains your reason for submitting Form W-7. A selection 
must be made in this section.
Note. If you check box a or f, then box h may also be checked. If 
applicable, you must also enter the treaty country and treaty 
article. For more information on treaties, see Pub. 901, U.S. T ax 
T reaties.
a. Nonresident alien required to get an ITIN to claim tax 
treaty benefit. Certain nonresident aliens must get an ITIN to 
claim certain tax treaty benefits even if they don’t have to file a 
U.S. federal tax return. If you check this box to claim the benefits 
of a U.S. income tax treaty with a foreign country, also check box 
h. On the dotted line next to box h, enter the appropriate 
designation for Exception 1 or 2, whichever applies (see 
Exception 1  and Exception 2 , later). Identify the exception by its 
number, alpha subsection, and category under which you’re 
applying (for example, enter “Exception 1d-Pension Income” or 
“Exception 2d-Gambling Winnings”). Also, enter the name of the 
treaty country and treaty article number in the appropriate entry 
spaces below box h and attach the documents required under 
whichever exception applies. For more details on tax treaties, 
see Pub. 901.
b. Nonresident alien filing a U.S. federal tax return. This 
category includes:
•A nonresident alien who must file a U.S. federal tax return to 
report income effectively or not effectively connected with the 
conduct of a trade or business in the United States, and
•A nonresident alien who is filing a U.S. federal tax return only 
to get a refund. See Pub. 519.
-6- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 7 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
If you choose reason b, you must  provide a complete 
foreign address on line 3.
c. U.S. resident alien (based on days present in the United 
States) filing a U.S. federal tax return. A foreign individual 
living or present in the United States for a certain number of days 
(that is, meeting the test known as the “substantial presence” 
test) who doesn’t have permission to work from the USCIS, and 
is ineligible for an SSN, may still be required to file a U.S. federal 
tax return. These individuals must check this box and include a 
date of entry into the United States on line 6d. For information 
about the substantial presence test, see Pub. 519.
d. Dependent of U.S. citizen/resident alien. This is an 
individual who can be claimed as a dependent on a U.S. federal 
tax return and isn’t eligible to get an SSN. Y our spouse is never 
considered your dependent. See Pubs. 501 and 519. 
Dependents of U.S. military personnel can submit original 
documents, certified copies or notarized copies of identification 
documents. A copy of the servicemember’s U.S. military ID will 
be required or the applicant must be applying from an overseas 
APO/FPO address. A copy of the servicemember’s U.S. military 
ID is required to be included with the application if the 
documents are notarized.
If you’re applying for an ITIN under this category, you must 
provide the relationship (for example, parent, child, grandchild, 
etc.) of the dependent to the U.S. citizen/resident alien. Enter the 
information on the dotted line in the space provided.
Also, if you’re applying for an ITIN under this category, you 
must  provide the full name and SSN or ITIN  of the U.S. citizen/
resident alien. Enter the information on the dotted line in the 
space provided and include a date of entry into the United States 
on line 6d, unless the applicant is a dependent of U.S. military 
personnel stationed overseas or is from Canada or Mexico and 
the applicant is claimed for an allowable tax benefit.
Note. If you live abroad and requested an adoption taxpayer 
identification number (ATIN) for a foreign child you adopted or 
who has been legally placed in your home pending adoption and 
that request was denied, your dependent may be eligible for an 
ITIN. When submitting your Form W-7, make sure that you 
include a copy of the legal documents verifying your relationship 
to the child.
Dependents can be claimed as personal exemptions 
only for tax years prior to 2018. However, the credit for 
other dependents (ODC) for your child and other 
qualifying relatives (excluding your spouse) who live in the 
United States may be available. See the instructions for your 
U.S. federal tax return for more information.
e. Spouse of U.S. citizen/resident alien. This category 
includes:
•A resident or nonresident alien spouse who isn’t filing a U.S. 
federal tax return (including a joint return) and who isn’t eligible 
to get an SSN but who, as a spouse, is claimed as an exemption; 
and
•A resident or nonresident alien spouse who isn’t eligible to get 
an SSN but who is electing to file a U.S. federal tax return jointly 
with a spouse who is a U.S. citizen or resident alien. For more 
information about this category, see Pubs. 501 and 519.
Spouses of U.S. military personnel can submit original 
documents, certified copies, or notarized copies of identification 
documents. A copy of the servicemember’s U.S. military ID will 
be required or the applicant must be applying from an overseas 
APO/FPO address. A copy of the servicemember’s U.S. military 
ID is required to be included with the application if the 
documents are notarized.
CAUTION!
CAUTION!If you’re applying for an ITIN under this category, you must 
provide the full name and SSN or ITIN  of the U.S. citizen/
resident alien. Enter the information on the dotted line in the 
space provided.
A spouse can be claimed as a personal exemption only 
for tax years prior to 2018.
f. Nonresident alien student, professor, or researcher filing 
a U.S. federal tax return or claiming an exception. This is an 
individual who hasn’t abandoned his or her residence in a 
foreign country and who is a bona fide student, professor, or 
researcher coming temporarily to the United States solely to 
attend classes at a recognized institution of education, to teach, 
or to perform research. For more information about the U.S. tax 
rules that apply to foreign students, professors, or researchers, 
see Pub. 519.
If you check this box, you must complete lines 6a, 6c, 6d, and 
6g, and provide your passport with a valid U.S. visa. No U.S. visa 
needs to be provided if the foreign address is Canada, Mexico, 
or Bermuda. If you’re present in the United States on a 
work-related visa (F-1, J-1, or M-1), but won’t be employed (that 
is, your presence in the United States is study related), you can 
choose to attach a letter from the Designated School Official 
(DSO) or Responsible Officer (RO) instead of applying to the 
SSA for an SSN. The letter must clearly state that you won’t be 
securing employment while in the United States and your 
presence here is solely study related. This letter can be 
submitted instead of a Social Security Administration denial 
letter if you’re filing a tax return with this Form W-7 or claiming 
Exception 2  (explained later).
Nonresident alien students and exchange visitors, their 
spouses, and dependents under the Student Exchange Visitors 
Program (SEVP) claiming Exception 2 (no tax return attached) 
can have their original ID certified by an SEVP-approved 
institution, rather than mailing originals to the IRS. These are 
individuals admitted to the United States under an F , J, or M visa 
who receive taxable scholarships, fellowships, or other grants.
If you check this box to claim an exception under the benefits 
of a U.S. income tax treaty with a foreign country, also check box 
h. On the dotted line next to box h, enter the appropriate 
designation for Exception 2 , explained later. Identify the 
exception by its number, alpha subsection, and category under 
which you’re applying (for example, enter “Exception 
2b-Scholarship Income and claiming tax treaty benefits” or 
“Exception 2c-Scholarship Income”). Also, enter the name of the 
treaty country and the treaty article number in the appropriate 
entry spaces below box h (if applicable) and attach the 
documents required under Exception 2 .
g. Dependent/spouse of a nonresident alien holding a U.S. 
visa. This is an individual who can be claimed as a dependent 
for any tax year, or is a spouse on a U.S. federal tax return for a 
tax year before 2018, who is unable, or not eligible, to get an 
SSN, and who has entered the United States with a nonresident 
alien who holds a U.S. visa. If you apply for an ITIN under this 
category, remember to attach a copy of your visa to your Form 
W-7 and include a date of entry into the United States on line 6d.
Dependents and spouses can be claimed as personal 
exemptions only for tax years prior to 2018.
h. Other. If the reason for your ITIN request isn’t described in 
boxes a through g, check this box. Describe in detail your reason 
for requesting an ITIN and attach supporting documents.
Frequently, third parties (such as banks and other financial 
institutions) that are subject to information-reporting and 
withholding requirements will request an ITIN from you to enable 
them to file information returns required by law. If you’re 
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -7-Page 8 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
requesting an ITIN for this reason, you may be able to claim one 
of the exceptions described later. Enter on the dotted line next to 
box h the exception that applies to you. Identify the exception by 
its number, alpha subsection (if applicable), and category under 
which you’re applying (for example, enter “Exception 
1a-Partnership Income” or “Exception 3-Mortgage Interest”). 
Examples of completed Forms W-7 for “Exceptions” can be 
found in Pub. 1915. Y ou won’t need to attach a tax return to your 
Form W-7.
Exception 1. Passive income—third-party withholding or 
tax treaty benefits. This exception may apply if you’re the 
recipient of partnership income, interest income, annuity income, 
rental income, or other passive income that’s subject to 
third-party withholding or covered by tax treaty benefits. See 
Exceptions T ables , later, for more details on Exception 1.
Information returns applicable to Exception 1 may include the 
following.
•Form 1042-S, Foreign Person’s U.S. Source Income Subject 
to Withholding.
•Form 1099-INT , Interest Income.
•Form 1099-MISC, Miscellaneous Information.
•Form 8805, Foreign Partner’s Information Statement of 
Section 1446 Withholding T ax.
•Schedule K-1 (Form 1065), Partner’s Share of Income, 
Deductions, Credits, etc.
Applicants receiving compensation for personal services 
performed in the United States, or issued a U.S. visa 
that’s valid for employment, should first apply for an SSN 
with the SSA. Unless you’re denied an SSN by the SSA and 
attach the denial letter to your Form W-7, you aren’t eligible for 
an ITIN.
If you’re required to file a federal tax return, then you 
aren’t eligible for Exception 1.
Exception 2. Other income. This exception may apply if:
1.Y ou’re claiming the benefits of a U.S. income tax treaty 
with a foreign country and you receive any of the following.
a.Wages, salary, compensation, and honoraria payments;
b.Scholarships, fellowships, and grants; and/or
c.Gambling income; or
2.Y ou’re receiving taxable scholarship, fellowship, or grant 
income, but not claiming the benefits of an income tax treaty.
See Exceptions T ables , later, for more details on Exception 2. 
Information returns applicable to Exception 2 may include Form 
1042-S.
Exception 3. Mortgage interest—third-party reporting. 
This exception may apply if you have a home mortgage loan on 
real property you own in the United States that’s subject to 
third-party reporting of mortgage interest. See Exceptions 
T ables , later, for more details on Exception 3. Information returns 
applicable to Exception 3 may include Form 1098, Mortgage 
Interest Statement.
Exception 4. Dispositions by a foreign person of U.S. real 
property interest—third-party withholding. This exception 
may apply if you’re a party to a disposition of a U.S. real property 
interest by a foreign person, which is generally subject to 
withholding by the transferee or buyer (withholding agent). This 
exception may also apply if you have a notice of non-recognition 
under Regulations section 1.1445-2(d)(2). See Exceptions 
T ables , later, for more details on Exception 4.
Information returns applicable to Exception 4 may include the 
following.
•Form 8288, U.S. Withholding T ax Return for Certain 
Dispositions by Foreign Persons.
CAUTION!
CAUTION!•Form 8288-A, Statement of Withholding on Certain 
Dispositions by Foreign Persons.
•Form 8288-B, Application for Withholding Certificate for 
Dispositions by Foreign Persons of U.S. Real Property Interests.
Exception 5. Treasury Decision (T.D.) 9363. This exception 
may apply if you have an IRS reporting requirement as a 
non-U.S. representative of a foreign corporation who needs to 
obtain an ITIN for the purpose of meeting their e-filing 
requirement under T .D. 9363 and you are submitting Form W-7. 
See Exceptions T ables , later, for more details on Exception 5.
If you’re applying for an ITIN under this exception, enter 
“Exception 5, T .D. 9363” on the dotted line next to box h.
Line Instructions
Enter “N/A” (not applicable) on all sections of each line that don’t 
apply to you. Don’t  leave any section blank. For example, line 4 
should have three separate entries.
Line 1a. Enter your legal name on line 1a as it appears on your 
identifying documents. Be sure to properly identify your first, 
middle, and last names. This entry should reflect your name as 
it’ll appear on a U.S. federal tax return.
Note. If you’re renewing your ITIN and your legal name has 
changed since the original assignment of your ITIN, you’ll need 
to submit documentation to support your legal name change, 
such as your marriage certificate or a court order, which may 
include a divorce decree. Attach supporting documentation to 
Form W-7.
Y our ITIN will be established using this name. If you don’t 
use this name on the U.S. federal tax return, the 
processing of the U.S. federal tax return may be delayed.
Line 1b. Enter your name as it appears on your birth certificate 
if it’s different from your entry on line 1a.
Line 2. Enter your complete mailing address on line 2. This is 
the address the IRS will use to return your original documents 
and send written notification of your ITIN application status.
The IRS won’t use the address you enter to update its records 
for other purposes unless you include a U.S. federal tax return 
with your Form W-7. If you aren’t including a U.S. federal tax 
return with your Form W-7 and you changed your home mailing 
address since you filed your last U.S. federal tax return, also file 
Form 8822, Change of Address, with the IRS at the address 
listed in the Form 8822 instructions.
Note. If the U.S. Postal Service won’t deliver mail to your 
physical location, enter the U.S. Postal Service’s post office box 
number for your mailing address. Contact your local U.S. Post 
Office for more information. Don’t use a post office box owned 
and operated by a private firm or company.
Line 3. Enter your complete foreign (non-U.S.) address in the 
country where you permanently or normally reside, even if it’s the 
same as the address on line 2. If you no longer have a 
permanent foreign residence due to your relocation to the United 
States, enter only the foreign country where you last resided on 
line 3. If you’re claiming a benefit under an income tax treaty with 
the United States, the income tax treaty country must be the 
same as the country listed on line 3.
If you choose reason b, you must  provide a complete 
foreign address on line 3.
Don’t use a post office box or an “in care of” (c/o) 
address instead of a street address on line 2 if you’re 
entering just a “country” name on line 3. If you do, your 
application may be rejected.
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
CAUTION!
-8- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 9 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Line 4. Enter your date of birth in the month/day/year (MM/DD/
YYYY) format, where MM = 1 to 12 and DD = 1 to 31. T o be 
eligible for an ITIN, your birth country must be recognized as a 
foreign country by the U.S. Department of State.
Line 6a. Enter the country or countries (in the case of dual 
citizenship) in which you’re a citizen. Enter the complete country 
name; don’t abbreviate.
Line 6b. If your country of residence for tax purposes has 
issued you a tax identification number, enter that number on 
line 6b. For example, if you’re a resident of Canada, enter your 
Canadian social security number (known as the Canadian Social 
Insurance Number).
Line 6c. Enter only U.S. nonimmigrant visa information. Include 
the USCIS classification, number of the U.S. visa, and the 
expiration date in month/day/year format. For example, if you 
have an F-1/F-2 visa with the number 123456, enter, in the entry 
space, F-1/F-2 and 123456, followed by the visa’s expiration 
date in MM/DD/YYYY format. Individuals in possession of an 
I-20/I-94 document(s) should attach a copy to their Form W-7.
Line 6d. Check the box indicating the type of document(s) 
you’re submitting to prove your identity. Enter the name of the 
state or country or other issuer, the identification number (if any) 
appearing on the document(s), the expiration date, and the date 
on which you entered the United States. Dates must be entered 
in the month/day/year format.
Note. If you’re submitting a passport, or a certified copy of a 
passport from the issuing agency, no other documentation is 
required to prove your identity and foreign status. Ensure any 
visa information shown on the passport is entered on line 6c and 
the pages of the passport showing the U.S. visa (if a visa is 
required for your Form W-7) are included with your Form W-7. A 
passport that doesn’t have a date of entry into the United States 
will no longer be accepted as a stand-alone identification 
document for dependents, unless the dependents are from 
Canada, Mexico, or are dependents of U.S. military personnel 
stationed overseas.
If you’re submitting more than one document, enter only the 
information for the first document on this line. Attach a separate 
sheet showing the required information for the additional 
document(s). On the separate sheet, be sure to write your name 
and “Form W-7” at the top.
The “Date of entry into the United States” must contain 
the complete date on which you entered the country for 
the purpose for which you’re requesting an ITIN (if 
applicable). If you’ve never entered the United States, enter 
“Never entered the United States” on this line. A passport 
without an entry date doesn’t prove U.S. residency and may not 
be used as a stand-alone document for certain dependents. See 
Supporting Documentation Requirements , earlier.
Example. Y ou entered the United States last year to work. 
Y ou want to file a tax return for the income you earned in the 
United States that year. Y ou aren’t eligible to get a social security 
number. Y ou file Form W-7 with your tax return for that year. On 
line 6d of your Form W-7, enter, as the “Date of entry into the 
United States,” the month, day, and year you entered the United 
States in MM/DD/YYYY format.
Line 6e. If you ever received an ITIN and/or an Internal Revenue 
Service Number (IRSN), check the “Y es” box and complete 
line 6f. If you never had an ITIN or an IRSN, or if you don’t know 
your ITIN or IRSN, check the No/Don’t know  box.
An IRSN is a nine-digit number issued by the IRS to persons 
who file a return or make a payment without providing a taxpayer 
identification number. Y ou would’ve been issued this number if 
you filed a U.S. federal tax return and didn’t have an SSN. This 
CAUTION!IRSN will appear on any correspondence the IRS sent you 
concerning that return.
If you’re submitting Form W-7 to renew your ITIN, you must 
include your previously assigned ITIN on line 6f to avoid delays 
in processing your Form W-7.
Line 6f. If you have an ITIN and/or an IRSN, list them in the 
space(s) provided. Identify your first, middle, and last name 
under which the ITIN and/or IRSN was issued. If you were issued 
more than one IRSN, attach a separate sheet listing all the 
IRSNs you received. On the separate sheet, be sure to write your 
name and “Form W-7” at the top.
If you’re submitting Form W-7 to renew your ITIN, the name 
under which you applied for your ITIN must be included on line 6f 
to avoid delays in processing your Form W-7.
Note. If you’re renewing your ITIN and your legal name has 
changed since the original assignment of your ITIN, you’ll need 
to submit documentation to support your legal name change, 
such as your marriage certificate or a court order, which may 
include a divorce decree. Attach supporting documentation to 
Form W-7.
Line 6g. If you checked reason f, you must enter the name of 
the educational institution and the city and state in which it’s 
located. Y ou must also enter your length of stay in the United 
States.
If you’re temporarily in the United States for business 
purposes, you must enter the name of the company with whom 
you’re conducting your business and the city and state in which 
it’s located. Y ou must also enter your length of stay in the United 
States.
Signature
Who Can Sign Form W-7
Generally, the applicant is required to sign Form W-7. The 
following are exceptions to this requirement.
Applicant is a dependent under 18 years of age. If the 
applicant is a dependent under 18 years of age, his or her parent 
or court-appointed guardian can sign if the child can’t sign. The 
parent or court-appointed guardian must type or print his or her 
name in the space provided and check the appropriate box that 
indicates his or her relationship to the applicant. If the individual 
is signing as a court-appointed guardian, a copy of the 
court-appointment papers showing the legal guardianship must 
be attached.
Adults, other than a parent or court-appointed guardian, can 
sign Form W-7 only if a Form 2848, Power of Attorney and 
Declaration of Representative, has been signed by a parent or 
court-appointed guardian authorizing the individual to sign for 
the applicant.
Applicant is a dependent 18 years of age or older. If an 
applicant is 18 years of age or older, the applicant or a 
court-appointed guardian can sign or appoint a parent or another 
individual to sign. The individual (if other than the applicant) 
must type or print their name in the space provided and check 
the appropriate box that indicates their relationship to the 
applicant. If the individual is signing as a court-appointed 
guardian, a copy of the court-appointment papers showing the 
legal guardianship must be attached. Individuals other than the 
applicant or a court-appointed guardian must attach a Form 
2848 from the applicant or court-appointed guardian authorizing 
them to sign the Form W-7.
A spouse can’t  sign for his or her spouse, unless the 
Power of attorney  box is checked and Form 2848 has 
been attached to Form W-7.
CAUTION!
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -9-Page 10 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Applicant can’t sign their name. If an applicant can’t sign his 
or her name, then the applicant must sign his or her mark (for 
example, an “X” or a thumbprint) in the presence of a witness. 
The witness’s signature is also required and must be identified 
as that of a witness.
Note. All Powers of Attorney (POAs) submitted to the IRS must 
be in English. Any POAs received in a foreign language will be 
considered invalid unless accompanied by a certified English 
translation. The POA must clearly state the purpose for which it’s 
intended under the Acts authorized  section. For more 
information, go to IRS.gov.
Acceptance Agent’s Use ONL Y
Complete all fields as appropriate and enter the eight-digit office 
code that was issued to you by the ITIN Program Office.
Paperwork Reduction Act Notice. We ask for the information 
on this form to carry out the Internal Revenue laws of the United 
States. Y ou are required to give us the information. We need it to ensure that you are complying with these laws and to allow us to 
figure and collect the right amount of tax.
Y ou are not required to provide the information requested on 
a form that is subject to the Paperwork Reduction Act unless the 
form displays a valid OMB control number. Books or records 
relating to a form or its instructions must be retained as long as 
their contents may become material in the administration of any 
Internal Revenue law. Generally, tax returns and return 
information are confidential, as required by Internal Revenue 
Code section 6103.
The average time and expenses required to complete and file 
this form will vary depending on individual circumstances. For 
the estimated averages, see the instructions for your income tax 
return.
If you have suggestions for making this form simpler, we 
would be happy to hear from you. See the instructions for your 
income tax return.
-10- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 11 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables
Exception #1
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
Third-Party 
Withholding on 
Passive IncomePersons who are eligible to claim Exception 1 include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 1:
1(a)  Individuals who are partners of a U.S. or foreign 
partnership that invests in the United States and that owns 
assets that generate income subject to IRS 
information-reporting and federal tax withholding 
requirements; or1(a)  A copy of the portion of the partnership or LLC 
agreement displaying the partnership’s employer 
identification number and showing that you’re a partner in 
the partnership that’s conducting business in the United 
States.
1(b)  Individuals who have opened an interest-bearing 
bank deposit account that generates income that’s 
effectively connected with their U.S. trade or business and 
is subject to IRS information reporting and/or federal tax 
withholding; or1(b)  An original signed letter from the bank on its official 
letterhead, displaying your name and stating that you’ve 
opened a business account that’s subject to IRS information 
reporting and/or federal tax withholding on the interest 
generated during the current tax year.
1(c)  Individuals who are “resident aliens” for tax purposes 
and have opened an interest-bearing bank deposit 
account that generates income subject to IRS information 
reporting and/or federal tax withholding; or1(c)  An original signed letter from the bank on its official 
letterhead, displaying your name and stating that you’ve 
opened an individual deposit account that’s subject to IRS 
information reporting and/or federal tax withholding on the 
interest generated during the current tax year.
1(d)  Individuals who are receiving distributions during the 
current tax year of income such as pensions, annuities, 
rental income, royalties, dividends, etc., and are required 
to provide an ITIN to the withholding agent (for example, 
an investment company, insurance company, financial 
institution, etc.) for the purposes of tax withholding and/or 
reporting requirements.1(d)  An original document or signed letter from the 
withholding agent, on official letterhead, showing your name 
and verifying that an ITIN is required to make distributions to 
you during the current tax year that are subject to IRS 
information reporting and/or federal tax withholding. 
Self-generated income statements will only be accepted with 
a copy of the contract or a letter with a postmarked envelope 
addressed from the withholding agent.
Exception #2
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
2(a). Wages, 
Salary, 
Compensation, 
and Honoraria 
PaymentsPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 2(a) 
include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 2(a):
Individuals claiming the benefits of a tax treaty who:
Claiming the 
benefits of a tax 
treaty•Are either exempt or subject to a reduced rate of 
withholding of tax on their wages, salary, compensation, 
and honoraria payments;
 
and
•Will be submitting Form 8233 to the payer of the income.•An original letter of employment from the payer of the 
income; or
•A copy of the employment contract; or
•A letter requesting your presence for a speaking 
engagement, etc.;
along with:
•Evidence (information) on the Form W-7 that you’re 
entitled to claim the benefits of a tax treaty, and
•A copy of the completed withholding agent’s portion of 
Form 8233 attached to Form W-7.
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -11-Page 12 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables (continued)
Exception #2 (continued)
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
2(b). 
Scholarships, 
Fellowships, 
and GrantsPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 2(b) 
include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 2(b):
Individuals claiming the benefits of a tax treaty who:
Claiming the 
benefits of a tax 
treaty•Are either exempt from or subject to a reduced rate of 
tax on their income from scholarships, fellowships, or 
grants (that is, foreign students, scholars, professors, 
researchers, foreign visitors, or any other individual);
 
and
•Will be submitting Form W-8BEN to the withholding 
agent.•An original letter or official notification from the college or 
university awarding the noncompensatory scholarship, 
fellowship, or grant; or
•A copy of a contract with a college, university, or 
educational institution;
along with:
 
 
Note.  Student and Exchange Visitor Program 
(SEVP)-approved institutions for nonresident alien 
students and exchange visitors and their spouses and 
dependents classified under section 101(a)(15)(F), (M), or 
(J) of the Immigration and Nationality Act {8 U.S.C. 1101(a)
(15)(F), (M), or (J)}: A certification letter is required for 
each Form W-7 application: primary, associated 
secondary (spouse), and dependent(s).1
 
 
1 The original certification letter from an SEVP-approved 
institution serves as a substitute for submission of original 
supporting identification documents with Form W-7. The 
certification letter must:
•Be on original, official college, university, or institution 
letterhead with a verifiable address;
•Provide the applicant’s full name and Student Exchange 
Visitor’s Information System (SEVIS) number;
•Certify the applicant’s registration in SEVIS; 
•Certify that the student presented an unexpired 
passport, visa, or other identification documents for review 
(Exception: a U.S. visa isn’t required if the foreign address 
is in Canada or Mexico);
•List the identification documents provided to verify 
identity and foreign status;
•Be signed and dated by an SEVIS official: Principal 
Designated School Official (PDSO), Designated School 
Official (DSO), Responsible Officer (RO), or Alternate 
Responsible Officer (ARO) of a certified school exchange 
program with a verifiable contact telephone number;
•Attach copies of documents used to verify the 
applicant’s identity and foreign status from the approved 
list of documents presented in the Form W-7 instructions 
(passport must include a copy of the valid visa issued by 
the U.S. Department of State). A U.S. visa isn’t required if 
the foreign address is in Canada or Mexico;
•Attach a copy of Form DS-2019, Certificate of Eligibility 
for Exchange Visitor (J-1) Status and/or a copy of Form 
I-20, Certificate of Eligibility for Nonimmigrant Student 
Status;
•Form W-7 must include the treaty country and article 
number that supports claiming a tax treaty benefit; and
•Include a letter from the DSO or RO stating that the 
applicant won’t be securing employment in the United 
States or receiving any type of income from personal 
services.•An original or copy certified by the issuing agency of 
passport showing the valid visa issued by the U.S. 
Department of State,
•Evidence (information) on the Form W-7 that you’re 
entitled to claim the benefits of a tax treaty,
•A copy of the Form W-8BEN that was submitted to the 
withholding agent, and
•A letter from the Social Security Administration2 stating 
that you’re ineligible to receive a social security number 
(SSN).
 
 
2 If you’re a student on an F-1, J-1, or M-1 visa who won’t be 
working while studying in the United States, you won’t have 
to apply for an SSN. Y ou will be permitted to provide a letter 
from the Designated School Official (DSO) or Responsible 
Officer (RO) stating that you won’t be securing employment 
in the United States or receiving any type of income from 
personal services.
-12- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 13 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables (continued)
Exception #2 (continued)
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
2(c). 
Scholarships, 
Fellowships, 
and GrantsPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 2(c) 
include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 2(c):
Individuals (that is, foreign students, scholars, professors, 
researchers, or any other individuals) receiving 
noncompensatory income from scholarships, fellowships, 
or grants that’s subject to IRS information-reporting and/or 
withholding requirements during the current year.•An original letter or official notification from the 
educational institution (that is, college or university) awarding 
the noncompensatory scholarship, fellowship, or grant; or
•A copy of a contract with a college, university, or 
educational institution;
along with:
Not claiming 
benefits of a tax 
treaty 
 
Note.  Student and Exchange Visitor Program 
(SEVP)-approved institutions for nonresident alien 
students and exchange visitors and their spouses and 
dependents classified under section 101(a)(15)(F), (M), or 
(J) of the Immigration and Nationality Act {8 U.S.C. 1101(a)
(15)(F), (M), or (J)}: A certification letter is required for 
each Form W-7 application: primary, associated 
secondary (spouse), and dependent(s).1
 
 
1 The original certification letter from an SEVP-approved 
institution serves as a substitute for submission of original 
supporting identification documents with Form W-7. The 
certification letter must:
•Be on original, official college, university, or institution 
letterhead with a verifiable address;
•Provide the applicant’s full name and Student Exchange 
Visitor’s Information System (SEVIS) number;
•Certify the applicant’s registration in SEVIS; 
•Certify that the student presented an unexpired 
passport, visa, or other identification documents for review 
(Exception: a U.S. visa isn’t required if the foreign address 
is in Canada or Mexico);
•List the identification documents provided to verify 
identity and foreign status;
•Be signed and dated by an SEVIS official: Principal 
Designated School Official (PDSO), Designated School 
Official (DSO), Responsible Officer (RO), or Alternate 
Responsible Officer (ARO) of a certified school exchange 
program with a verifiable contact telephone number;
•Attach copies of documents used to verify the 
applicant’s identity and foreign status from the approved 
list of documents presented in the Form W-7 instructions 
(passport must include a copy of the valid visa issued by 
the U.S. Department of State). A U.S. visa isn’t required if 
the foreign address is in Canada or Mexico;
•Attach a copy of Form DS-2019, Certificate of Eligibility 
for Exchange Visitor (J-1) Status and/or a copy of Form 
I-20, Certificate of Eligibility for Nonimmigrant Student 
Status;
•Form W-7 must include the treaty country and article 
number that supports claiming a tax treaty benefit; and
•Include a letter from the DSO or RO stating that the 
applicant won’t be securing employment in the United 
States or receiving any type of income from personal 
services.•An original or copy certified by the issuing agency of 
passport showing a valid visa issued by the U.S. Department 
of State (a U.S. visa isn’t required if the foreign address is in 
Canada or Mexico);
•An original letter from the DSO or RO stating that you’re 
receiving noncompensatory income from scholarships, 
fellowships, or grants that’s subject to IRS 
information-reporting and/or federal tax withholding 
requirements during the current year (this letter must be 
attached to your Form W-7 or your application for an ITIN will 
be denied); and
•A letter from the Social Security Administration2 stating 
that you’re ineligible to receive a social security number 
(SSN).
 
 
 
2 If you’re a student on an F-1, J-1, or M-1 visa who won’t be 
working while studying in the United States, you won’t have 
to apply for an SSN. Y ou will be permitted to provide a letter 
from the DSO or RO stating that you won’t be securing 
employment in the United States or receiving any type of 
income from personal services.
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -13-Page 14 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables (continued)
Exception #2 (continued)
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
2(d). Gambling 
IncomePersons who are eligible to claim Exception 2(d) 
include:Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 2(d):
Nonresident aliens visiting the United States who:
Claiming the 
benefits of a tax 
treaty•Have gambling winnings,
•Are claiming the benefits of a tax treaty for an exempt or 
reduced rate of federal tax withholding on that income, and
•Will be utilizing the services of a gaming official as an 
IRS ITIN Acceptance Agent.Y our Form W-7, which must be submitted through the 
services of an appropriate gaming official serving as an IRS 
ITIN Acceptance Agent to apply for an ITIN under Exception 
2(d).
 
Note.  If you don’t secure the services of a gaming official, 
you may still file Form 1040-NR at the end of the tax year 
with a Form W-7, attaching a copy of Form 1042-S 
displaying the amount of tax withheld. Y our Form 1040-NR 
should also display the tax treaty article number and country 
under which you’re claiming the treaty benefits.
Exception #3
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
Third-Party 
Reporting of 
Mortgage 
InterestPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 3 include: Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 3:
Individuals with a home mortgage loan on real property 
located in the United States.•Documentation showing evidence of a home mortgage 
loan. This includes a copy of the contract of sale or similar 
documentation showing evidence of a home mortgage loan 
on real property located in the United States.
Exception #4
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
Third-Party 
Withholding—
Disposition by 
a Foreign 
Person of U.S. 
Real Property 
InterestPersons who are eligible to claim Exception 4 include: Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 4:
An individual who is a party to the disposition of U.S. real 
property interest by a foreign person (buyer or other 
transferee such as a withholding agent) or notice of 
non-recognition1 under Regulations section 1.1445-2(d)(2) 
from the transferor.•A completed Form 8288, Form 8288-A, or Form 8288-B; 
and
•A copy of the real estate sales contract, Settlement 
Statement (HUD-1), or Closing Disclosure.
•In the case of notice of non-recognition1, document(s) that 
evidence a transaction for which a notice of non-recognition 
is applicable.
 
Note.  For the seller of the property, copies of the sales 
contract, Settlement Statement (HUD-1), or Closing 
Disclosure, and copies of Forms 8288 and 8288-A submitted 
by the buyer need to be attached to Form W-7.
 
1 For notices of non-recognition, the document must show 
the date of the transaction, the parties involved, and the type 
of transfer that took place. For example, for transfers 
involving real estate, valid documents include the deed, 
Direction to Convey form, or a document that identifies the 
replacement property in a like-kind exchange. For transfers 
involving stock, an example of a valid document is the 
document that facilitates the transaction.
-14- Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023)Page 15 of 15  Fileid: … ons/iw-7/202311/a/xml/cycle03/source 10:04 - 1-Nov-2023
The type and rule above prints on all proofs including departmental reproduction proofs. MUST be removed before printing.
Exceptions Tables (continued)
Exception #5
 
Note.  Federal tax withholding and/or information reporting must take place within the current tax year.
Reporting 
Obligations 
under T.D. 9363Persons who are eligible to claim Exception 5 include: Documentation you must submit if you’re eligible to 
claim Exception 5:
A non-U.S. representative of a foreign corporation who 
needs to obtain an ITIN for the purpose of meeting their 
e-filing requirements.•Along with your Form W-7, include an original signed 
letter from your employer on corporate letterhead stating that 
an ITIN is needed for T .D. 9363, and you have been 
designated as the person responsible for ensuring 
compliance with IRS information-reporting requirements.
Instructions for Form W-7 (Rev. November 2023) -15-, please generate cvc5 smt formulas for the following extract constraints: To extract the requirements and constraints from the provided document, let's list them comprehensively:

### Requirements

1. **Form W-7 Submission Scenarios**:
   - Apply for a new ITIN.
   - Renew an existing ITIN.

2. **General Form W-7 Requirements**:
   - Must be properly signed by the applicant or an authorized person.
   - Submit original documents or certified copies unless otherwise specified.
   - Attach a U.S. federal tax return unless claiming an exception.

3. **Supporting Documentation**:
   - Submit documentation to establish identity and foreign status.
   - Use at least one document with a photograph unless the applicant is a dependent under 14 (or under 18 if a student).
   - Acceptable documents are listed (e.g., passport, visa, U.S. driver's license, etc.).

4. **Special Cases**:
   - Dependents from Canada, Mexico, or dependents of U.S. military personnel stationed overseas have specific documentation requirements.
   - Dependent applicants must also prove U.S. residency unless from Canada, Mexico, or qualifying under U.S. military exception.
   - Spouses and dependents must provide additional documents if the passport does not have a date of entry into the U.S.

5. **Change of Address**:
   - Notify the IRS immediately if the mailing address changes before receiving the ITIN.

6. **Application Process**:
   - First-time applicants must include Form W-7 attached to the original tax return, required supporting documents, and any necessary exceptions.
   - Renewal applicants must include the expired ITIN and relevant documentation.
   
7. **Submission Methods**:
   - By mail to the designated IRS address.
   - By private delivery service to a specific IRS address.
   - In person at IRS Taxpayer Assistance Centers (TACs).
   - Through an acceptance agent or certifying acceptance agent.

8. **Documentation for Exceptions**: Specific requirements for different exceptions (such as third-party withholding on passive income, employment income, scholarships, and more) are outlined.

9. **Special Instructions for Deceased Taxpayers**:
   - Include specific documentation depending on whether it’s filed by the surviving spouse, court-appointed executor/administrator, or other.

### Constraints

1. **Documentation Constraints**:
   - Documents submitted must be originals or certified copies from issuing entities.
   - Documents must be current (not expired).
   - The passport without a date of entry is not a stand-alone document for dependents unless specific exceptions apply.

2. **Specific Situations Constraints**:
   - U.S. resident aliens must have a date of entry into the U.S.
   - Tax benefits: Spouses or dependents are not eligible unless claimed for an allowable tax benefit or filing their own tax return.
   - Names must match on supporting documents and Form W-7.

3. **Submission Constraints**:
   - Form W-7 and supporting documents must be submitted to specific addresses depending on the method of delivery.
   - Renewal of ITINs must be done before using them on U.S. federal tax returns that will include them.
   - In-person verification of documents at TACs must be by appointment only.

4. **Validity Constraints**:
   - ITINs that haven’t been used on at least one U.S. federal tax return in the last three consecutive tax years will expire on December 31 of the third consecutive year.
   - ITINs with middle digits from “70” to “88” and assigned before 2013, “90” to “99” have expired.

5. **Exception Handling Constraints**:
   - Documentation specifics are needed for each exception type outlined in the tables, including the type of income, tax treaty benefits, scholarships, etc.

6. **Tax-Related Constraints**:
   - ITINs are solely for federal tax purposes; they do not grant eligibility for social security benefits or authorize work in the U.S.

By adhering to these extracted requirements and constraints, individuals can ensure compliance with the IRS stipulations when applying for or renewing an ITIN using Form W-7. 
        ===================generated formulas===========================
To generate cvc5 SMT formulas for the identified constraints and requirements, we need to translate the rules and specifications into formal logic. The cvc5 SMT (Satisfiability Modulo Theories) solver can handle constraints specified in standard logical forms. Here’s the possible translation of the requirements and constraints into SMT formulas.

### Requirements and Constraints Formulated:

#### Variables
- `FormType`: Integer (0 = New, 1 = Renewal)
- `IsSigned`: Boolean
- `HasOriginalDocs`: Boolean
- `HasCertifiedCopies`: Boolean
- `HasTaxReturnAttached`: Boolean
- `ClaimingException`: Boolean
- `SupportingDoc`: Integer (0 = Passport, 1 = Visa, 2 = US_DriverLicense, etc.)
- `IsDependent`: Boolean
- `UnderAge14`: Boolean
- `UnderAge18`: Boolean
- `IsSpouse`: Boolean
- `IsFromCanadaMexicoUSMilitary`: Boolean
- `HasDateOfEntry`: Boolean
- `MailingAddressChanged`: Boolean
- `ApplicationContainsITIN`: Boolean
- `HasCompleteForeignAddress`: Boolean
- `HasCurrentDocs`: Boolean
- `DocsAreCertified`: Boolean
- `U.S.DateOfEntry`: Boolean
- `ClaimedForBenefit`: Boolean
- `NameMatches`: Boolean
- `SubmittedToCorrectAddress`: Boolean
- `InPersonVerification`: Boolean
- `ValidDocumentsForExceptions`: Boolean
- `IsDeceased`: Boolean
- `FiledBySurvivingSpouse`: Boolean
- `FiledByExecutorOrOther`: Boolean

### SMT Formulas

```smt
;; Define the variables
(declare-fun FormType () Int)
(declare-fun IsSigned () Bool)
(declare-fun HasOriginalDocs () Bool)
(declare-fun HasCertifiedCopies () Bool)
(declare-fun HasTaxReturnAttached () Bool)
(declare-fun ClaimingException () Bool)
(declare-fun SupportingDoc () Int)
(declare-fun IsDependent () Bool)
(declare-fun UnderAge14 () Bool)
(declare-fun UnderAge18 () Bool)
(declare-fun IsSpouse () Bool)
(declare-fun IsFromCanadaMexicoUSMilitary () Bool)
(declare-fun HasDateOfEntry () Bool)
(declare-fun MailingAddressChanged () Bool)
(declare-fun ApplicationContainsITIN () Bool)
(declare-fun HasCompleteForeignAddress () Bool)
(declare-fun HasCurrentDocs () Bool)
(declare-fun DocsAreCertified () Bool)
(declare-fun U.S.DateOfEntry () Bool)
(declare-fun ClaimedForBenefit () Bool)
(declare-fun NameMatches () Bool)
(declare-fun SubmittedToCorrectAddress () Bool)
(declare-fun InPersonVerification () Bool)
(declare-fun ValidDocumentsForExceptions () Bool)
(declare-fun IsDeceased () Bool)
(declare-fun FiledBySurvivingSpouse () Bool)
(declare-fun FiledByExecutorOrOther () Bool)

;; General Form W-7 Requirements
(assert
    (and
        (or IsSigned (not IsSigned))
        (implies IsSigned (or HasOriginalDocs HasCertifiedCopies))
        (implies (not ClaimingException) HasTaxReturnAttached)
    )
)

;; Supporting Documentation constraints
(assert
    (and
        (or SupportingDoc 0 1 2)
        (implies (and IsDependent (or UnderAge14 UnderAge18))
            (and SupportingDoc HasDateOfEntry))
    )
)

;; Documentation Constraints
(assert
    (and
        (or HasOriginalDocs HasCertifiedCopies)
        HasCurrentDocs
        (implies (not (or IsSpouse IsDependent IsDeceased)) HasOriginalDocs)
    )
)

;; Dependent Case Constraints
(assert
    (implies
        (and IsDependent (not IsFromCanadaMexicoUSMilitary))
        HasDateOfEntry)
)

;; Change of Address Constraint
(assert
    (implies MailingAddressChanged
        (not (= FormType 1)))
)

;; Application Process Constraints
(assert
    (implies
        (= FormType 0)
        (and IsSigned HasTaxReturnAttached)))
(assert
    (implies
        (= FormType 1)
        (and ApplicationContainsITIN HasTaxReturnAttached)
    )
)

;; Submission Methods Constraints
(assert
    (or SubmittedToCorrectAddress InPersonVerification)
)

;; Validity Constraints
(assert
    (and 
        (= FormType 1)
        ValidDocumentsForExceptions
    )
)

;; Tax-Related Constraints
(assert
    (not ClaimedForBenefit)
)
```

These formulas should be used as a foundation for constructing cvc5 SMT logic that checks if a given Form W-7 application adheres to the outlined requirements and constraints. This logic ensures that:
- The form is signed and appropriately filled out.
- Correct supporting documents are provided based on the type of applicant.
- Documentation validity is checked.
- Submission rules are adhered to.
- Special cases like dependents, deceased taxpayers, and exception handling are correctly managed.

You can run these SMT formulas using cvc5 to verify the logic against Form W-7 applications. Adjust or extend the formulas as needed to cover additional requirements or constraints as identified.